Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene.
Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas.
18L/36R. is the runway name of Adolfo Suárez Airport.
The ICAO Location Identifier of Afonso Pena is SBCT.
Afonso Pena Airport serves the city of Curitiba.
Taqaddum Air Airport serves the city of Fallujah.
The runway length of Taqaddum Air Airport is 3684.0.
14/32 is the runway name of Alderney Airport Airport.
The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 3360.12.
Amsterdam Airport Airport 1st runway is Number 18.
The fourth runway at Schiphol Airport in Amsterdam Airport made of Asphalt.
06/24 'Kaagbaan' is the runway name of Amsterdam Airport Airport.
Andrews County is 973.0 metres above sea level.
Andrews County Regional Airport owner Andrews County, Texas, Michigan.
The runway length of Andrews County Airport is 896.0.
The 1st runway at Angola International is made from Asphalt.
Antwerp International is 12.0 metres above sea level.
Antwerp International is operated by Flemish Government A/S.
The runway length of Appleton International Airport is 2439.0.
The runway length of Ardmore Airport Airport is 518.0.
The ICAO Location Identifier of Ashgabat International is UTAA.
11/29 is the runway name of Ashgabat International Airport.
Atlantic City Regional Airport owner South Jersey Transportation Authority, Michigan.
13/31 is the runway name of Atlantic City Airport.
The Dutch language language is spoken in Belgium.
Curitiba is is part of South Region.
Denmark demonym is Danes.
Fallujah is located in Iraq.
Greenville is located in the United.
Greenville is part of of Grand Chute.
The Arabic language is spoken in Iraq.
Madrid is located in Spain.
Maple Ridge is part of the United.
The leader of Pakistan is Sardar Ayaz Sadiq.
The Port Authority of New Jersey and New Jersey serves the New York region.
Houston is the largest city in Texas, Texas.
One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the 1986 United States bombing of Libya Grenada.
The Boeing C-17 Globemaster III is a transport aircraft in the United States Force.
The 11th Mississippi Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11.
Adams County  has to its southeast  Carroll County, Maryland
The leader, of Azerbaijan (New Mexico), is Artur Rasizade.
The Azerbaijan, Pakistan, is led by Prime Minister of Azerbaijan Assembly of the Punjab.
Türk Şehitleri Anıtı Force Station is the native name of Baku Turkish.
11 Diagonal is located in South Africa.
The architectural style of the 250 Delaware Hall is Postmodern architecture.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago.
George Winkler is the architect of South Boston.
1910 was the start date for the building at South Boston Row.
1634: AC Hotel Bella Crisis has 814 pages.
James Pain and George Richard Pain, is the architect of Adare Manor.
Aidsham Hall is located in Haputale.
Akita Museum is located in Japan.
Alan B. Miller Regional Airport owner College of William & Mary, Michigan.
Amdavad ni is located on Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT University, opp. Gujarat University, University Road's Monastery, Adisham, Haputhale, Sri Lanka.
Asher and Mary Grounds has the reference number 88002539 in the National Register of Historic Places.
Julia Morgan is the architect of Asilomar Conference.
Arts and Crafts Movement and American craftsman Bungalows is the architect of Asilomar Conference.
Asilomar Conference Isabelle Richardson House was built in 1913.
Asser Levy is located in New York City.
Buffalo New is part of Erie County, New York.
The leader of Buffalo New is Byron Brown.
County Limerick is part of Munster.
The leader of Dublin is Críona Ní Dhálaigh.
The leader of Ethiopia is Mulatu Teshome.
Indian demonym is Indians.
One of the significant buildings designed by Julia Morgan is the Los Angeles Herald-Examiner.
Live Nation Entertainment is located in Beverly Hills, California.
Manhattan is part of New York.
New York City is part of New Netherland.
Pacific Grove is part of California.
White South African are an ethnic group in the South Africa.
The leader of United kingdom is Elizabeth II.
1634: The Ram Rebellion Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "1-4165-2060-0-1-4165-4253-7".
by Eric Flint is the author of The Ram Rebellion: The Baltic War.
A The Ram Rebellion was published in print.
AIDS is located in is United.
The OCLC number of A A Glastonbury is 76798317.
A A Glastonbury was published in hardback.
The English language is spoken in long long way.
Diane Duane is the author of Wizard of Mars: The Baltic War.
The ISSN number of ACM Abhandlungen on Information Systems is 0025-5858-8188.
is Garth Nix is the author of Above the Veil: The Baltic War.
A Above the Veil was published in print.
The ISSN number of ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems is 0567-7920-8188.
93645978 is the LCCN number of ACM Addiction journal on Information Systems.
ACM Addiction journal on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Addiction Science.
The English language is spoken in Aenir.
Alcatraz Versus is located in the United.
The English language is spoken in Alcatraz Versus.
ACM American Journal on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Math Science.
The English language is spoken in Castle.
Eric Flint was born in Burbank, California.
Farrar, Straus and Giroux University is the parent company of the Macmillan Publishers University Press.
One of John Cowper Powys notable works is A Glastonbury.
Soho Press is located in United States.
Faber and Faber for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM The Secret on information Systems.
Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States.
The English language is spoken in United States.
A Glastonbury short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: Weymouth Sands Crisis.
The manager of A.C. Chievo is Rolando Maran.
of A.D. Isidro play in Salvadoran Primera División A.
The full name of A.F.C. Blackpool Verona is "Association Football Club Blackpool Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.".
A.F.C. Blackpool's ground is in The Mechanics,.
A.F.C. Blackpool's ground is in Blackpool.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Gubbio.
A.S. Gubbio has 5300 members.
AEK Athens's ground is in Athens.
AEK Athens played in the 2014–15 Football League (Greece) season.
AZAL Arena is located in Baku.
AZAL PFK play in Azerbaijan Premier League A.
AZ Alkmaar played in the 15 Eredivisie season.
Akron is located in the United.
Akron is located in Summit County.
The full name of Akron Summit Verona is "Akron Metro Futbol Club Summit Assault Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.".
The leader, of Amsterdam (New Mexico), is Eberhard van.
Christian Panucci plays for Chelsea F.C..
Christian Panucci plays for Inter Milan.
Frank de Boer plays for FC Barcelona.
Gubbio is located in the region Umbria.
The leader, of Italy (New Mexico), is Sergio Mattarella.
Jens Hartel plays for FC Sachsen Leipzig.
Jorge Humberto plays for FC Dallas.
Luciano Spalletti plays for Udinese Calcio.
Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. S.S. Nola 1925.
Michele Marcolini plays for Atalanta B.C..
Michele Marcolini plays for for Vicenza.
Peter Stöger plays for 1. FC Köln.
Rolando Maran plays for F.C. Bari 1908.
Jong Ajax is the tenant of Sportpark De Sky Copenhagen.
St. Vincent is located in the United.
1 Decembrie is in Alba, Sri Lanka.
The president of Acharya Institute is B.M. Reddy.
Kerala  has to its northwest  Mahé, India
Mendrisio  neighboringMunicipality  Meride
Bucharest is the capital of Romania.
The dean of the School of Business Architettura di Mendrisio is Thomas Pallesen.
There are 16000 students at the School of Business Architettura di Mendrisio.
Alan Bean is an the United.
Apollo 8's backup pilot was Buzz Aldrin.
Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is Buzz Aldrin Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin served as a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin was chosen by NASA in 1963.
California  gemstone  Benitoite
Elliot See died on the 21st of July, 1966-02-28.
Elliot See Powys died in St. Louis.
Elliot See is deceased.
The creator of April O'Neil (comics character) is Kevin Eastman.
Bananaman is broadcast by BBC.
the full name of Ben Urich (comics character) is "Benjamin Urich".
The creator of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is Jerry Ordway.
the full name of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is "Bo Bibbowski".
Bill Oddie was born in Lancashire.
The comic character Black Pirate is also known as Jon Valor.
John Buscema won the Eisner award.
Karl Kesel is an Americans.
Marv Wolfman won the Kirby Award.
Peter Laird is an United States.
Scott Adsit was born in Northbrook, Illinois.
The area code of Albany, Indiana is 229.
Albany is part of the United.
The Albuquerque, Pakistan, is led by Mayor Assembly of the Punjab.
The Albuquerque, Pakistan, is led by New Mexico House of Representatives Assembly of the Punjab.
The Albuquerque, Pakistan, is led by New Mexico Senate Assembly of the Punjab.
Amarillo, in Indiana, has a total area of 233.9 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas.
Anderson is part of Richland Township, Madison County, Indiana.
Angola, Georgia is located at 324.0 above sea level.
The area code of Antioch, Indiana is 925.
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California.
The total population density of Arlington, Texas is 429.9 1472.0 (inhabitants per square kilometre) per sq km.
The leader, of Atlanta (New Mexico), is Kasim Reed.
Atlantic City, in Indiana, has a total area of 44.125 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey.
Attica, Georgia is located at 166.0 above sea level.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama.
Auburn, in Indiana, has a total area of 77.41 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Austin is part of Texas.
The Spanish language is spoken in California.
Dunwoody, Georgia is the largest city in De Kalb County, Texas.
Fulton County is located in the United.
Anderson is the County seat of Madison County, in Indiana.
Michigan is located in the United.
Detroit is the largest city in Michigan, Texas.
Orange County is located in the United.
Portland, Oregon is the largest city in Oregon, Texas.
is Fort Worth is the largest city in Tarrant County, Texas.
The leader, of United States (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
United States is located in United States Capitol.
Pecorino Romano is an ingredient in Amatriciana.
Chili pepper is an ingredient in Arrabbiata.
White rice is an ingredient in Arros negre.
Arros negre is located in the region Catalonia.
Arros negre is located in the region Valencian Community.
ayam penyet is located in the region Singapore.
tomatoes is an ingredient in BLT.
Baked Alaska is located in the region Hong Kong.
Bakewell pudding Airport serves the city of Warm or cold.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine.
Chicharrón is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Bandeja paisa is located in the region Paisa Region.
Barny cakes  servingSize  30.0 g
Batagor is a variation of Shumai.
The main ingredients of Batagor are fried fish dumpling with tofu and vegetables in peanut sauce rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
Shrimp is an ingredient in Batchoy.
Beef kway teow is located in the region Indonesia.
The comic character Bhajji is also known as Bhaji, bajji.
Taro is an ingredient in Binignit is.
Bionico is a variation of Cottage cheese.
Bionico is located in the region Jalisco.
Chicken class is Bird.
The currency in Indian is Indian rupee.
The leader of Indian is Sumitra Mahajan.
The Indonesian language language is spoken in Indonesia.
The leader of Jalisco is Aristóteles Sandoval.
Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in the Java.
Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is.
The leader of Mexico is Silvano Aureoles Conejo.
The Spanish language is spoken in New York.
Shumai is located in China.
Peanut sauce is an ingredient in Siomay.
Malays (ethnic group) are an ethnic group in the Sumatra.
The leader of United kingdom is David Cameron.
The 11th Mississippi Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument falls under the category of a contributing property.
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the district of the Monocacy National Battlefield. The city nearest to Monocacy National Battlefield is Frederick, Maryland.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku.
Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. Türk Şehitleri Anıtı Force Station is the native name of Baku Turkish.
Akron is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Albany is part of Oregon. Salem is the capital of Oregon.
Albuquerque is located in the United. The Albuquerque, Pakistan, is led by United States Assembly of the Punjab.
Amarillo is part of Texas. Amarillo is located in the United.
Anaheim is part of California. The Anaheim, Pakistan, is led by United States Assembly of the Punjab.
Anaheim is part of of Orange County. Orange County is located in the United.
Anderson is part of Adams Township. Adams Township is located in the United.
Antioch, in Indiana, has a total area of square kilometres kilometres. Antioch, Georgia is located at 13.0 above sea level.
Arlington, in Indiana, has a total area of 258.2 square kilometres. Arlington, Georgia is located at 184.0 above sea level.
Arlington is part of Texas. Texas is located in the United.
Atlanta is part of Georgia. Atlanta is located in the United.
Atlantic City is part of Atlantic. Atlantic City is located in the United.
Atlantic City is located in the United. Washington is the capital of United States.
Atlantic City is part of Atlantic. Atlantic County is located in the United.
The total population density of Atlantic City, Texas is 429.9 1421.2 inhabitants per sq km. Atlantic City, in Indiana, has a total area of 44.125 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Auburn is part of of Pierce County. Pierce County is located in the United.
Albany is part of the United. Washington is the capital of United States.
Amarillo is located in the United. Washington is the capital of United States.
Albuquerque is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Albany is part of the United. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Auburn is located in the United. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Akron is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States.
Albuquerque is located in the United. The United States, Pakistan, is led by President Assembly of the Punjab.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. tomatoes is an ingredient in Amatriciana.
Arem is located in Indonesia. The leader of Indonesia is Jusuf Kalla.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. The Italian language is spoken in Italy.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is Sergio Mattarella.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. Chili pepper is an ingredient in Arrabbiata.
Arros negre is located in Spain. Arros negre is located in the region Valencian Community.
Asam pedas is located in Indonesia. The main ingredients of Asam pedas are of fish cooked rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
ayam penyet is located in Indonesia. ayam penyet is located in the region Malaysia.
BLT is a variation of club sandwich. Bacon sandwich is a variation of BLT.
sausage is an ingredient in Bacon Explosion. The main ingredients of Bacon Explosion are bacon rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
bacon is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. The comic character Bacon sandwich is also known as bacon.
Bread is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. Bacon sandwich is a variation of BLT.
Baked Alaska is located in France. with sponge is an ingredient in Baked Alaska.
Baked Alaska is located in France. The leader of France is Manual Valls.
Baked Alaska is located in the United. Meringue is an ingredient in Baked Alaska.
Fruit preserves is an ingredient in Bakewell tart. Bakewell pudding is a variation of Bakewell tart.
bakso is located in Indonesia. Vermicelli is an ingredient in bakso.
Celery is an ingredient in bakso. Celery is part of the Apiaceae family.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine. Chicharrón is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Barny cakes is located in France. The leader of France is Claude Bartolone.
Batagor is located in Indonesia. Peanut sauce is an ingredient in Batagor.
Peanut sauce is an ingredient in Batagor. Batagor is a variation of Siomay.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore. Palm sugar is an ingredient in Beef kway teow.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore. The leader of Singapore is Halimah Yacob.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore and. The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
Bhajji is located in India. Indian demonym is Indians.
Bhajji is located in India. The leader of Indian is T. S. Thakur.
Binignit is is located in Philippines. Igorot people are an ethnic group in the Philippines.
Binignit is is located in Philippines. The main ingredients of Binignit is are banana rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
banana is an ingredient in Binignit is. The main ingredients of Binignit is are sweet potato rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
Bionico is located in Mexico. The leader of Mexico is Enrique Pena.
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico. Bionico is located in the region Guadalajara.
dessert is a variation of is cake. Bionico is a dessert.
bakso is located in Indonesia. The leader of Indonesia is is Joko Widodo.
Shiitake is an ingredient in Shumai. Batagor is a variation of Shumai.
The runway length of Aarhus Airport Airport is 2777.0. Aarhus Airport is operated by Aarhus Lufthavn A/S.
Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. Adolfo Suárez is 610 metres above sea level.
Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. The runway length of Adolfo Suárez Airport is 3500.0.
Uttar Pradesh is part of Awadh. Agra Airport is located in in Uttar Pradesh.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3090.0.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Iraq. The Arabic language is spoken in Iraq.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the Invasion of Grenada.
The 1st runway at Alderney Airport is made from Poaceae. Poaceae class is Monocotyledon.
The runway length of Alderney Airport Airport is 877.0. The 1st runway at Alderney Airport is made from Asphalt.
Allama Iqbal is located in Pakistan. The leader of Pakistan is Anwar Zaheer.
Allama Iqbal is located in Punjab Pakistan. The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 2900.0.
Amsterdam Airport is -3.3528 metres above sea level. The length of the first runway at Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is 3800 metres.
Amsterdam Airport is -3.3528 metres above sea level. The 1st runway at Amsterdam Airport is made from Asphalt.
The runway length of Amsterdam Airport Airport is 2014.0. Amsterdam Airport Airport serves the city of Amsterdam.
The runway length of Amsterdam Airport Airport is 3300.0. Amsterdam Airport Airport serves the city of Amsterdam.
Andrews County is located in Texas. Houston is the largest city in Texas, Texas.
The runway length of Angola International Airport is 3800.0. Angola International Airport serves the city of Luanda.
The runway length of Ardmore Airport Airport is 597.0. Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae.
Ashgabat International is 211 metres above sea level. The length of the first runway at Ashgabat International Airport is 12467 feet.
Ashgabat International is operated by Turkmenistan A/S. The headquarters of Turkmenistan Airlines are located in Turkmenistan.
Egg Harbor is located in the United. Atlantic City is located in Egg Harbor.
4/22 is the runway name of Atlantic City Airport. Atlantic City is operated by Port Authority A/S.
The runway length of Atlantic City Airport is 3048.0. Atlantic City is operated by Port Authority A/S.
Infraero is is located in Brasilia. Afonso Pena is operated by Infraero A/S.
FC Magdeburg played in the in Regionalliga season. FC Magdeburg has 27250 members.
A.C. Chievo's ground is in Verona. A.C. Chievo has 39371 members.
The manager of A.C. Chievo is Rolando Maran. Rolando Maran was born in Italy.
Jorge Humberto plays for FC Dallas. The manager of of A.D. Isidro is Jorge Humberto.
A.E Dimitra played in the 2014 season. A.E Dimitra has 1500 members.
Stuart Parker plays for Blackburn Rovers. The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is is Stuart Parker.
Stuart Parker plays for Irlam Town. The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is is Stuart Parker.
AFC Fylde's ground is in Lancashire. AFC Fylde has 3180 members.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Gubbio. A.S. Gubbio has 5300 members.
A.S. Livorno's ground is in Livorno. A.S. Livorno play in Serie A.
Christian Panucci plays for A.S. Roma. The manager of A.S. Livorno is by Christian.
Paulo Sousa plays for Juventus F.C.. The manager of ACF Fiorentina is is Paulo Sousa.
The full name of ACF Fiorentina Verona is "ACF Fiorentina Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". ACF Fiorentina has 47290 members.
AEK Athens's ground is in Greece. AEK Athens has 69618 members.
AEK Athens's ground is in Olympic Stadium. AEK Athens play in Superleague A.
AFC Ajax's ground is in Sportpark De. Jong Ajax is the tenant of Sportpark De Sky Copenhagen.
AZAL PFK is located in Shuvalan. AZAL PFK's ground is in AZAL Arena.
Akron Summit played in the 2011 PDL season season. Akron Summit has 3000 members.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Gubbio. Gubbio is located in the region Umbria.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Italy. The leader, of Italy (New Mexico), is Pietro Grasso.
Luciano Spalletti plays for Empoli F.C.. The manager of A.S. Roma is Luciano Spalletti.
The Grantville short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: The Bavarian Crisis. by Eric Flint is the author of The Bavarian: The Baltic War.
A The Ram Rebellion was published in E. Virginia DeMarce is the author of The Ram Rebellion: The Baltic War.
ACM AIP Advances on Information Systems has the abbreviation to AIP Adv. Inf. Syst. AIP Advances, ISSN number 2158-3226.
A Fortress of was published in print. J. V. Jones is the author of Fortress of: The Baltic War.
1634: Fortress of Crisis has 672 pages. 1634: Fortress of Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "is 0-1-4165-4253-7".
John Cowper is the author of A Glastonbury: The Baltic War. the novel 1634: A Glastonbury Crisis is followed by Weymouth Sands II.
A long long way was published in Print. The OCLC number of A long long way is 57392246.
1634: long long way Crisis has 292 pages. 1634: long long way Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "is 0-1-4165-4253-7".
by Viking press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM long long way on information Systems. Viking Press University is the parent company of the Penguin Random University Press.
A Loyal Character was published in print. Qiu Xiaolong is the author of Loyal Character: The Baltic War.
1634: severed wasp Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "26131-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A severed wasp is 8805735.
A severed wasp was published in hardback. The OCLC number of A severed wasp is 8805735.
The English language is spoken in severed wasp. The English language is spoken in Great Britain.
A severed wasp was published in print. 1634: severed wasp Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "26131-1-4165-4253-7".
Springer Science+Business for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Abhandlungen on information Systems. Julius Springer McCune is the founder of Springer Science.
1634: Alcatraz Versus Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "is 0-1-4165-4253-7". The literary genre of Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is Fantasy literature.
1634: Alcatraz Versus Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "is 0-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A Alcatraz Versus is 78771100.
by Brandon is the author of Alcatraz Versus: The Baltic War. the novel 1634: Alcatraz Versus Crisis is followed by Alcatraz II.
ACM American Journal on Information Systems has the abbreviation to Am. Inf. Syst. ACM American Journal on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Math Science.
Johns Hopkins for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM American Journal on information Systems. Johns Hopkins University is the parent company of the Johns Hopkins University Press.
The Ram Rebellion is located in the United. Washington is the capital of United States.
Fortress of is located in the United. Washington is the capital of United States.
Fortress of is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States.
1 Decembrie (amateurs) has the nickname "Uab". 1 Decembrie is in Alba, Sri Lanka.
Visvesvaraya is in the city of Belgaum, New York. Acharya Institute is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya of American Universities.
Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. The president of Acharya Institute is B.M. Reddy.
All India Council is located in Mumbai. The All India Council for Technical Education was proud to give the Technical Campus status to the Acharya Institute of Technology.
The leader of Kerala is Kochi. AWH Engineering is in Kerala, Sri Lanka.
The creator of April O'Neil (comics character) is is Peter Laird. Peter Laird is an United States.
Jill Shilling starred in the film Bananaman 6. Bananaman is broadcast by BBC.
Graeme Garden starred in the film Bananaman 6. Bananaman is broadcast by STV.
Tim Brooke starred in the film Bananaman 6. Tim Brooke was born in Derbyshire.
Alan Tudyk starred in the film Big Hero 6. Big Hero 6 was Baymax's first film appearance.
Scott Adsit starred in the film Big Hero 6. Big Hero 6 was Baymax's first film appearance.
The creator of Baymax (comics character) is Steve T. Seagle. Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6.
The creator of Ben Urich (comics character) is by Roger McKenzie. the full name of Ben Urich (comics character) is "Benjamin Urich".
The creator of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is Jerry Ordway. The creator of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is by Marv Wolfman.
The creator of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is by Marv Wolfman. the full name of Bibbo Bibbowski (comics character) is "Bo Bibbowski".
Alan Bean was born on the 15th of March 1932. Alan Bean is retired.
Alan Shepard was a test pilot. Alan Shepard is deceased.
Buzz Aldrin was born on the 15th of March 20,1930. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge.
Glen Ridge is part of Essex County. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge.
William Anders was born in British Hong. William Anders served as a crew member of Apollo.
William Anders is retired. AFIT is William Anders Johnson's almaMater.
Georges Terrace was completed in 1988. There are 50 floors at Georges Terrace Row.
200 Public is located in United States. There are 45 floors at 200 Public Row.
There are 34 floors at 20 Fenchurch Row. 20 Fenchurch Street has a floor area of 62145.3 square metres.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago. There are 60 floors at 300 North LaSalle Row.
George Winkler is located in the United. George Winkler is the architect of South Boston.
3Arena is located in East Link Bridge. HOK SVE is the architect of 3Arena.
3Arena is located in Dublin. Populous is the architect of 3Arena.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Copenhagen. Marriott International is the tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen.
George Richard is the architect of Adare Manor. Adare Manor was completed in 1862.
Adare Manor is located in Adare. Adare Manor is located in County Limerick.
Addis Ababa is located in Ethiopia. Addis Ababa is located in Addis Ababa.
Aidsham Hall is located in Haputale. The architectural style of the Aidsham Hall Hall is is Tudor Revival.
Aidsham Hall is located in Sri Lanka. The architectural style of the Aidsham Hall Hall is is Tudor Revival.
Akita Museum is located in Japan. Brazilians are an ethnic group in the Japan.
There are 3 floors at Akita Museum Row. Akita Museum is located on is 142 Nakadori's Monastery, Adisham, Haputhale, Sri Lanka.
Amdavad ni is located in Gujarat. Amdavad ni is located on Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT University, opp. Gujarat University, University Road's Monastery, Adisham, Haputhale, Sri Lanka.
The leader of Eastern Province is Austin Fernando. Ampara Hospital is in Eastern Province, Sri Lanka.
New York City is located in the United. Asser Levy is located in New York City.
New York City is part of Brooklyn. Asser Levy is located in New York City.
County Limerick is part of Munster. Adare Manor is located in County Limerick.
Dublin is part of Republic of. 3Arena is located in Dublin.
Alan Bean is an the United. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , is Retired.
The leader of United States is Joe. Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is Buzz Aldrin Johnson's almaMater.
Elliot See is an the United. Elliot See was born in Dallas. University of Texas at Austin is , Johnson's almaMater.
Elliot See was chosen by NASA in 1962. University is Elliot See Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in St. Louis.
The leader of St Louis is Francis. University is Elliot See Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in St. Louis.
St Louis is part of kingdom of. Elliot See died on the 21st of July, 1966-02-28. , Powys died in St. Louis.
Alan Shepard spent 13017.0 minutes in space. Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. The Purple finch is a native bird to ,.
A The Bavarian was published in print. 1634: , Crisis has 448 pages. by Virginia is the author of The Bavarian: The Baltic War.
The English language is spoken in The Ram Rebellion. The Galileo short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: The Ram Rebellion Crisis. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
The leader of Association is Alexander L.. Association for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Transactions on information Systems. The headquarters of , Airlines are located in New York City.
The ISSN number of ACM AIDS on Information Systems is 0269-8188. ACM AIDS on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline HIV Science. ACM , on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline HIV/AIDS Science.
The ISSN number of ACM AIDS on Information Systems is 1473-8188. ACM AIDS on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline HIV Science. ACM , on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline HIV/AIDS Science.
AIP Advances editors include the following: A.T. Charlie Crespi, Bernard S. Gerstman, A.T. Charlie Johnson, Masaaki Tanaka, Enge G. Wang. Stanford University is A.T. Charlie Johnson's almaMater. , United States resides in the United States.
J. V. Jones is the author of Fortress of: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "0-7653-0633-6-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A Fortress of is 51969173.
Qiu Xiaolong is the author of Loyal Character: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "1-56947-301-3-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A Loyal Character is 49805501.
Soho Press is located in United States. The English language is spoken in Loyal Character. Soho Press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems.
severed wasp is located in the United. The English language is spoken in severed wasp. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
A severed wasp was published in hardback. 1634: severed wasp Crisis has 388 pages. The OCLC number of A , is 8805735.
The ISSN number of ACM Abhandlungen on Information Systems is 1865-8188. ACM Abhandlungen on Information Systems has the abbreviation Abh. Inf. Syst. 32024459 is the LCCN number of ACM , on Information Systems.
Above the Veil is located in Australia. The English language is spoken in Aenir. the novel 1634: , Crisis is followed by Above the Veil II.
The English language is spoken in Above the Veil. Garth Nix is the author of ,: The Baltic War. the novel 1634: Aenir Crisis is followed by Above the Viel II.
A Above the Veil was published in hardback. 1634: , Crisis has 248 pages. is Garth Nix is the author of Above the Veil: The Baltic War.
The ISSN number of ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems is 0567-7920-8188. ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems has the abbreviation is Acta Palaeontol. Inf. Syst. 60040714 is the LCCN number of ACM , on Information Systems.
The ISSN number of ACM Addiction journal on Information Systems is 1360-8188. ACM Addiction journal on Information Systems has the abbreviation Addiction. Inf. Syst. ACM , on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Addiction Science.
Wiley for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Addiction journal on information Systems. The ISSN number of ACM Addiction journal on Information Systems is 0965-8188. , University is the parent company of the John Wiley & Sons University Press.
by Cornell for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Administrative on information Systems. , is affiliated with the Association of American Universities of American Universities. Cornell University is in New York, Sri Lanka.
The English language is spoken in Aenir. Garth Nix is the author of ,: The Baltic War. the novel 1634: Aenir Crisis is followed by Above the Viel II.
Alcatraz Versus is located in the United. The English language is spoken in Alcatraz Versus. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
A Alcatraz Versus was published in hardback. 1634: Alcatraz Versus Crisis has 320 pages. The OCLC number of A , is 78771100.
Alcatraz Versus is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
John Cowper was born in Shirley. John Cowper is the author of A Glastonbury: The Baltic War. , Powys died in Blaenau Ffestiniog.
SAGE Publications for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Administrative on information Systems. The ISSN number of ACM Administrative on Information Systems is 0001-8188. Sara Miller Mc Cune McCune is the founder of ,.
severed wasp is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The English language is spoken in Wizard of Mars. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
The Ram Rebellion is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Fortress of is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Jens Hartel plays for FC Lokomotive. Jens Hartel plays for SV Germania. The manager of , is Jens Härtel.
Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. Licata. Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. S.S. Nola 1925. The manager of , is Massimo Drago.
The full name of Lumezzane Verona is "Associazione Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". Lumezzane play in in Lega Pro A. , has 4150 members.
Jorge Humberto plays for Alianza F.C.. Jorge Humberto plays for El Salvador. The manager of , is Jorge Humberto Rodríguez.
A.E Dimitra's ground is in Efxeinoupolis. A.E Dimitra has 1500 members. Antonis Milionis is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
A.F.C. Blackpool's ground is in Blackpool. The full name of A.F.C. Blackpool Verona is "Association Football Club Blackpool Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". , has 1500 members.
Stuart Parker plays for Chesterfield. Stuart Parker plays for Runcorn F.C.. The manager of , is Stuart Parker (footballer).
Dave Challinor plays for Stockport County. Dave Challinor plays for Colwyn Bay. The manager of , is Dave Challinor.
A.S. Livorno's ground is in Livorno. The full name of A.S. Livorno Verona is "is Livorno Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". , has 19238 members.
The manager of A.S. Livorno is by Christian. A.S. Livorno play in Serie A. The name of the championship football team in the , Premier League Os the Carpi F.C. 1909.
Christian Panucci plays for Chelsea F.C.. Christian Panucci plays for Real Madrid. The manager of , is Christian Panucci.
AEK Athens's ground is in Greece. AEK Athens play in Superleague A. The name of the championship football team in the , Premier League Os the Olympiacos F.C..
Gus Poyet plays for is Real Zaragoza. Gus Poyet plays for Chelsea F.C.. The manager of , is Gus Poyet.
AFC Ajax's ground is in Amsterdam. The leader, of Amsterdam (New Mexico), is Eberhard van. , Noord is part of Amsterdam-Centrum.
AFC Ajax's ground is in Amsterdam. The leader, of Amsterdam (New Mexico), is Eberhard van. , Noord is part of Amsterdam-Noord.
John van den plays for Jong Ajax. John van den plays for Istanbulspor. The manager of , is John van den Brom.
Campeonato is located in Brazil. Agremiacao's ground is in Minicipal Coaracy. , play in Campeonato Brasileiro Série C A.
Luciano Spalletti plays for Udinese Calcio. Luciano Spalletti plays for Empoli F.C.. The manager of , is Luciano Spalletti.
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti. Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. Licata. The manager of , is Massimo Drago.
Massimo Drago plays for U.S Castrovillari. Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. S.S. Nola 1925. The manager of , is Massimo Drago.
Massimo Drago plays for U.S Castrovillari. Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti. The manager of , is Massimo Drago.
103 Colmore is located in Colmore Row. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. , was born in Birmingham.
Cleveland is is part of Cuyahoga County. , is located in Cleveland. The leader of Cleveland is is Frank G Jackson.
250 Delaware is located in the United. There are 12 floors at 250 Delaware Row. , Street has a floor area of 30843.8 (square metres) metres.
Chicago is part of DuPage County. , is located in Chicago. The leader of Chicago is Rahm Emanuel.
George Winkler is located in the United. George Winkler is the architect of South Boston. There are 22 floors at , Row.
3Arena is located in North Wall. HOK SVE is the architect of 3Arena. , was completed in December 2008.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Denmark. There are 23 floors at AC Hotel Bella Row. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen.
3XN is the architect of AC Hotel Bella. There are 23 floors at AC Hotel Bella Row. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen.
Augustus Pugin is the architect of Adare Manor. Augustus Pugin was born in Bloomsbury. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Palace of Westminster.
Philip Charles is the architect of Adare Manor. , was completed in 1862. Adare Manor Regional Airport owner JP McManus, Michigan.
Aidsham Hall is located in Haputale. Aidsham Hall was completed in 1931. The architectural style of the , Hall is Tudor and Jacabian.
Aidsham Hall is located in Sri Lanka. Aidsham Hall was completed in 1931. The architectural style of the , Hall is Tudor and Jacabian.
Aidsham Hall is located in Sri Lanka. , is located in Haputale. The leader of Sri Lanka is Ranil Wickremesinghe.
Aidsham Hall is located in Sri Lanka. Sri Jayawardenepura is the capital of Sri Lanka. The currency in , is Sri Lankan rupee.
Mason School is located in the United. on 30 March was the start date for the building at Alan B. Miller Row. The Mason School of Business of , is the current tenant of the Addis Ababa City Hall.
Julia Morgan is the architect of Asilomar Conference. Julia Morgan was born in San Francisco. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Riverside Art Museum.
Julia Morgan is the architect of Asilomar Conference. Julia Morgan was born in California. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Chinatown, San Francisco.
Asilomar Conference is located in Asilomar Blvd. , Grounds has the reference number 87000823 in the National Register of Historic Places. The Asilomar Conference Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1987.
Asser Levy is located in Avenue. The Asser Levy Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1980. , Isabelle Richardson House was built in 1904.
Asser Levy is located in New York City. The Asser Levy Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1980. , Isabelle Richardson House was built in 1904.
The leader of Birmingham is Conservative. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. Birmingham is the home town of ,.
The leader of Birmingham is Liberal Democrats. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. , was born in Birmingham.
Addis Ababa is located in Ethiopia. , is located in Addis Ababa. The leader of Ethiopia is Hailemariam.
Amdavad ni is located in Ahmedabad. , is located in Gujarat. The leader of Gujarat is Anandiben Patel.
Marriott International is located in Bethseda. Bill Marriott is the key person for Marriott International. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen.
Albany is part of Dougherty County. Albany is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
The Albuquerque, Pakistan, is led by New Mexico Senate Assembly of the Punjab. The total population density of Albuquerque, Texas is 429.9 1142.3 inhabitants per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 490.9 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Alpharetta is part of Fulton County. Alpharetta is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Alpharetta is part of Georgia. Alpharetta is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Alpharetta is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States.
Anaheim, in Indiana, has a total area of 131.6 square kilometres. The area code of Anaheim, Indiana is 657. The UTC offset for ,, California -7.
Anaheim is part of California. California is located in California. The ,, Pakistan, is led by California State Senate Assembly of the Punjab.
Anderson is part of Lafayette. , is part of Indiana. Lafayette Township is located in the United.
Angola is part of of Pleasant. Angola is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California. Contra Costa is part of San Francisco. The ,, Pakistan, is led by United States House of Representatives Assembly of the Punjab.
Arlington is part of of Tarrant. Tarrant County is located in the United. Fort Worth, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Atlanta is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States.
The total population density of Atlanta, Texas is 429.9 1299.0 inhabitants per sq km. Atlanta, in Indiana, has a total area of square kilometres kilometres. The area code of ,, Indiana is 404.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey. Atlantic City is located in the United. Newark, New Jersey is the largest city in ,, Texas.
Atlantic City is part of Atlantic. Atlantic County is located in the United. New York City is the largest city in ,, Texas.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. , is part of Alabama. Alabama is located in the United.
Auburn is part of Washington. Washington is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Auburn is part of Washington. Washington is located in the United. Olympia, Washington is the capital of ,.
Albany is part of Georgia. Albany is part of Dougherty County. Atlanta is the capital of ,.
Alexandria is part of Madison County. Madison County is located in the United. Anderson, Indiana is the largest city in ,, Texas.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey. New Jersey is located in the United. Trenton, New Jersey is the capital of ,.
Arlington is part of Texas. The English language is spoken in Texas. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas.
Attica is part of Fountain. Attica is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Attica is part of Fountain. Fountain County is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Akron is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Akron is part of Summit County. Akron is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Albany is part of Benton County. Albany is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Albuquerque is located in the United. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
Albany is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Angola is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
The runway length of Aarhus Airport Airport is 2776.0. 10R/28L. is the runway name of Aarhus Airport Airport. , is operated by Aarhus Lufthavn A/S A/S.
The runway length of Adirondack Airport is 2003.0. Adirondack Airport serves the city of of Lake Placid. , Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, New York.
Paracuellos is part of Community of. Paracuellos is located in Spain. , is located in Paracuellos de Jarama.
Agra Airport is located in in Uttar Pradesh. Agra Airport is operated by Indian Air A/S. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is VIAG.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Iraq. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3992.88. , is operated by United States Air Force A/S.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the 1986 United States bombing of Libya Grenada. , Air FOrce aircraft fighter is Mc Donnell Douglas F-15 Eagle F-16 Fighting Falcon.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the Invasion of Grenada. , Air FOrce aircraft fighter is Mc Donnell Douglas F-15 Eagle F-16 Fighting Falcon.
The runway length of Alderney Airport Airport is 877.0. Alderney Airport Airport serves the city of Alderney. The 1st runway at , is made from Poaceae.
Allama Iqbal is located in Pakistan. Allama Iqbal is operated by Pakistan Civil A/S. The headquarters of , Airlines are located in Jinnah International Airport.
Allama Iqbal is located in Punjab Pakistan. The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 2900.0. 18L/36R is the runway name of , Airport.
Maple Ridge is located in the United. Alpena County is located in Maple Ridge. , is 210 metres above sea level.
Andrews County is located in Texas. The runway length of Andrews County Airport is 1773.0. , is 973.0 metres above sea level.
Andrews County is located in Texas. The runway length of Andrews County Airport is 896.0. , is 973.0 metres above sea level.
Andrews County is located in Texas. The English language is spoken in Texas. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,.
Texas is located in the United. Andrews County is located in Texas. , demonym is Tejano.
Antwerp is located in Belgium. The German language is spoken in Belgium. , Airport serves the city of Antwerp.
Egg Harbor is part of Atlantic. Egg Harbor is located in the United. , is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey.
Atlantic City is operated by Port Authority A/S. The headquarters of Port Authority Airlines are located in Four World. The , of New Jersey and New Jersey serves the New York region.
Egg Harbor is located in the United. Atlantic City is located in Egg Harbor. The runway length of , Airport is 3048.0.
Lahore is located in Pakistan. The leader of Pakistan is Anwar Zaheer. , Airport serves the city of Lahore.
Madrid is part of Community of. Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid. The leader party at , is the Ahora Madrid Party (Spain).
Madrid is located in Spain. Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid. The leader party at , is the Ahora Madrid Party (Spain).
San Sebastian is located in Spain. Adolfo Suárez is located in San Sebastián. The leader party at , is the People's Party (Spain) Party (Spain).
11th Mississippi is located in United States. 11th Mississippi is located in Adams County. ,  has to its southeast  Carroll County, Maryland
11th Mississippi is located in Adams County. The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is in the municipality of Gettysburg , Pennsylvania. ,  has to its southeast  Carroll County, Maryland
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. Baku is the capital of Azerbaijan. Türk Şehitleri Anıtı Force Station is the native name of ,.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. The leader, of Azerbaijan (New Mexico), is Artur Rasizade. The National Assembly (Azerbaijan) dictates the legislature of ,.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The leader of Turkey is is Ahmet Davutoglu. Ankara is the capital of ,.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. Guanciale is an ingredient in Amatriciana. , is located in the region Lazio.
banana leaf is an ingredient in Arem. The main ingredients of , are compressed rice cooked in banana leaf with vegetables or minced meat fillings rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. Arem is located in the region of Javanese.
tomatoes is an ingredient in Arrabbiata. Tomato is part of the Solanaceae family. , belongs to the division of Flowering plant.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. Olive oil is an ingredient in Arrabbiata. , is located in the region Rome.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. tomatoes is an ingredient in Arrabbiata. , is located in the region Rome.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. The main ingredients of , are Fish cooked in sour and hot sauce rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. Asam pedas is located in the region Malay Peninsula.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. The leader of Malaysia is is Arifin Zakaria. Kuala Lumpur is the capital of ,.
ayam penyet is located in Indonesia. Malaysian Chinese are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is. , is located in the region Malaysia.
Lettuce is an ingredient in BLT. BLT is a variation of club sandwich. , is a variation of BLT.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. White Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. The leader of United States is John Roberts. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Bread is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. Bacon sandwich is a variation of BLT. , is a variation of Club sandwich.
Baked Alaska is located in France. with sponge is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. , is located in the region New York.
Baked Alaska is located in France. The leader of France is Manual Valls. The currency in , is Euro.
Baked Alaska is located in the United. Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. , is located in the region New York.
with sponge is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. dessert is a variation of A cookie. , is Dessert.
The main ingredients of Bakewell pudding are ground almond rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is Dessert. Bakewell pudding is located in the region Derbyshire.
The main ingredients of Bakewell pudding are ground almond rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is a variation of Bakewell tart. Bakewell pudding is located in the region Derbyshire.
bakso is located in Indonesia. beef is an ingredient in bakso. , is located in the region Indonesia.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine. Avocado is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa. , is located in the region Paisa Region.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine. Hogao is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa. , is located in the region Paisa Region.
Barny cakes is located in France. The leader of France is Claude Bartolone. The leader of , is Manuel Valls.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. noodles is an ingredient in Batchoy. The main ingredients of , are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp, beef rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. Vegetables is an ingredient in Batchoy. The main ingredients of , are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp, beef rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore. The leader of Singapore is Tony Tan. , is located in the region Nationwide in Singapore and Indonesia.
Beef kway teow is located in Indonesia. Sesame oil is an ingredient in Beef kway teow. , is located in the region Singapore.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore and. Oyster sauce is an ingredient in Beef kway teow. , is located in the region Singapore.
Bhajji is located in India. The leader of Indian is Sumitra Mahajan. The currency in , is Indian rupee.
banana is an ingredient in Binignit is. dessert is a variation of A cookie. , is Dessert.
Sago is an ingredient in Binignit is. dessert is a variation of A cookie. , is Dessert.
Taro is an ingredient in Binignit is. dessert is a variation of A cookie. , is Dessert.
banana is an ingredient in Binignit is. The main ingredients of Binignit is are sweet potato rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , belongs to the order of Solanales.
Bionico is located in Mexico. Granola is an ingredient in Bionico. , is Dessert.
Bionico is located in Mexico. raisins is an ingredient in Bionico. , is located in the region Guadalajara.
Bionico is located in Mexico. The leader of Mexico is Silvano Aureoles Conejo. The currency in , is Mexican peso.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is Pietro Grasso. Rome is the capital of ,.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. The Arabic language is spoken in Philippines. Igorot people are an ethnic group in the ,.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore. The leader of Singapore is Tony Tan. The English language language is spoken in ,.
tomatoes is an ingredient in Amatriciana. , is part of the Solanaceae family. Tomato belongs to the order of Solanales.
AWH Engineering is located in India. The academic staff at the , College number 250. AWH Engineering is in Kerala, Sri Lanka.
Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. Acharya Institute is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya of American Universities. The number of post graduate students at the , of Technology is about 700.
The leader of Kerala is Kochi. AWH Engineering is in Kerala, Sri Lanka. ,  has to its northwest  Mahé, India
1 Decembrie is located in Romania. Germans are an ethnic group in the Romania. The anthem of , is called Deșteaptă-te, române! te romane.
1 Decembrie is located in Romania. The leader of Romania is Klaus Iohannis. Germans of Romania are an ethnic group in the ,.
The School of Business Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11. School of Business is affiliated with the European University of American Universities. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels.
School of Business is located in Denmark. School of Business is in the city of Aarhus, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11.
The creator of Asterix (comics character) is by René Goscinny. The creator of Asterix (comics character) is Albert Uderzo. , is an French people.
Tim Brooke starred in the film Bananaman 6. Bananaman is broadcast by BBC. , last aired on April 15th 1986-04-15.
Scott Adsit starred in the film Big Hero 6. Big Hero 6 was Baymax's first film appearance. Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures Studios Motion Pictures is the distributor of the film , , 6.
Scott Adsit starred in the film Big Hero 6. Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures is the distributor of the film , Big Hero 6. , is a character in Big Hero 6 (film) 6.
Ryan Potter starred in the film Big Hero 6. Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures is the distributor of the film , Big Hero 6. , is a character in Big Hero 6 (film) 6.
The creator of Blockbuster (comics character) is Gardner Fox. The creator of Blockbuster (comics character) is by Carmine. The comic character , is also known as Mark Desmond.
The creator of Bolt (comics character) is Dan Mishkin. The creator of Bolt (comics character) is Gary. The comic character , is also known as Larry Bolatinsky.
The creator of Bolt (comics character) is by Ernie Colon. The creator of Bolt (comics character) is Gary. The comic character , is also known as Larry Bolatinsky.
103 Colmore is located in Birmingham. 103 Colmore was completed in 1976. There are 23 floors at , Row. 1973 was the start date for the building at , Row.
11 Diagonal is located in South Africa. Cape Town is the capital of ,. Asian South are an ethnic group in the South Africa. Coloured are an ethnic group in the ,.
Cleveland is is part of Cuyahoga County. Cleveland is is located in the United. , is located in Cleveland. ,'s governing body is Cleveland City Council City Council.
250 Delaware is located in Buffalo. There are 12 floors at 250 Delaware Row. , Street has a floor area of 30843.8 (square metres) metres. 108 St , cost 110 million (dollars) Australian dollars.
Chicago is part of in Cook County. Chicago is located in the United. , is located in Chicago. The leader of , is Rahm Emanuel.
300 North LaSalle is located in Illinois. 300 North LaSalle was completed in 2009. There are 60 floors at , Row. , Street has a floor area of 120770.0 (square metres) metres.
Dublin is part of Republic of. Dublin is part of Leinster. , is located in Dublin. , Regional Airport owner Live Nation Entertainment, Michigan.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Copenhagen. 3XN is the architect of AC Hotel Bella. There are 23 floors at , Row. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen.
County Limerick is part of Munster. Adare Manor is located in Adare. , is located in County Limerick. , is governed by the Limerick City and County Council and County Council.
Akita is part of Akita Prefecture. Akita Museum is located in Japan. , is located in Akita, Akita. Brazilians in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
Akita is part of Akita Prefecture. Akita Museum is located in Japan. , is located in Akita, Akita. Filipinos in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
Akita Museum is located in Japan. Akita Museum is located in Akita Prefecture. , is located in Akita, Akita. Vietnamese people in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
Akita Museum is located in Japan. Akita Museum is located in Akita Prefecture. , is located in Akita, Akita. Brazilians in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
Alan B. Miller is located in Williamsburg. , was completed in 1 June 2009. Alan B. Miller Regional Airport owner College of William & Mary, Michigan. , is located on 101 Ukrop Way's Monastery, Adisham, Haputhale, Sri Lanka.
Amdavad ni is located in India. , is located in Gujarat. The leader of Indian is Narendra Modi. The leader of , is Sumitra Mahajan.
Asilomar Conference is located in Pacific. , Grounds has the reference number 87000823 in the National Register of Historic Places. The Asilomar Conference Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1987. , Isabelle Richardson House was built in 1913.
Asser Levy is located in Avenue. , Grounds has the reference number 80002709 in the National Register of Historic Places. The Asser Levy Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1980. , Isabelle Richardson House was built in 1904.
New York City is part of Manhattan. New York City is part of Brooklyn. , is located in New York City. The leader of , is Cyrus Vance, Jr..
New York City is part of Manhattan. New York City is located in the United. , is located in New York City. The leader of , is Gale Brewer.
The leader of Birmingham is is Andrew Mitchell. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. , was born in Birmingham. ,, California has postal codes B postcode area.
The leader of Birmingham is Labour. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. , was born in Birmingham. ,, California has postal codes B postcode area.
Amdavad ni is located in India. , is located in Gujarat. The leader of Gujarat is Anandiben Patel. The leader of , is Sumitra Mahajan.
Amdavad ni is located in India. , is located in Gujarat. The leader of Indian is T. S. Thakur. The leader of , is Narendra Modi.
Akita Prefecture is located in Japan. Akita Museum is located in Akita Prefecture. , is located in Akita, Akita. Brazilians in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
20 Fenchurch is located in United. The leader of United kingdom is Elizabeth II. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Parliament of the United Kingdom Assembly of the Punjab. London is the capital of ,.
250 Delaware is located in the United. The leader of United States is Joe. The English language language is spoken in ,. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab.
11th Mississippi is located in United States. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Contributing property property. 11th Mississippi is in Pennsylvania, Sri Lanka.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Prime Minister of Azerbaijan Assembly of the Punjab. Baku is the capital of ,.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. Baku is the capital of Azerbaijan. , Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. Türk Şehitleri Anıtı Force Station is the native name of ,.
Monocacy National is located in Frederick. The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1907-07-11. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the district of the Monocacy National Battlefield Battlefield. The city nearest to , Battlefield is Frederick, Maryland, Maryland.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The leader of Turkey is is Ahmet Davutoglu. Ankara is the capital of ,. The , Plack is made from Bronze.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The Turkey, Pakistan, is led by President of Assembly of the Punjab. , Martyrs Memorial designer was Pietro Canonica Bütüner and Hilmi Güner. , Hall was in augurated on 1932-07-27-10-02.
Albany is part of Georgia. Albany is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,.
The total population density of Albuquerque, Texas is 429.9 1142.3 inhabitants per sq km. Albuquerque, in Indiana, has a total area of 490.9 square kilometres. The area code of ,, Indiana is 505, 575. The land area, of , (New Mexico), is 486.2 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Alpharetta is part of Georgia. , is part of Fulton County, Georgia. Alpharetta is located in the United. Atlanta is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Amarillo is part of Potter County. Potter County is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Amarillo is part of Potter County. Amarillo is located in the United. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,. , is in Texas, Sri Lanka.
Anaheim is part of California. California is located in California. The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. The ,, Pakistan, is led by California State Assembly Assembly of the Punjab.
Anderson is part of Adams. The total population density of Anderson, Texas is 429.9 inhabitants per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 107.43 (square kilometres) kilometres. ,, Georgia is located at 268.0 above sea level.
Angola is part of of Pleasant. , is part of Indiana. Angola is located in the United. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 16.55 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Antioch, in Indiana, has a total area of square kilometres kilometres. The area code of Antioch, Indiana is 925. The UTC offset for ,, California -7. ,, CA has 102372 people inhabiting it.
The Atlantic City, Pakistan, is led by Mayor Assembly of the Punjab. The total population density of Atlantic City, Texas is 429.9 1421.2 inhabitants per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 44.125 (square kilometres) kilometres. The area code of ,, Indiana is 609.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. Auburn is located in the United. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , is in Alabama, Sri Lanka.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. Lee County is located in the United. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , is in Alabama, Sri Lanka.
Auburn is part of of Pierce County. , is part of King County, Washington. Pierce County is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Auburn is part of Washington. , is part of King County, Washington. Auburn is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Austin is part of Texas. Austin is part of Hays County. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas. San Marcos, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Anaheim is part of California. California is located in California. The Chinese language language is spoken in ,. The ,, Pakistan, is led by California State Assembly Assembly of the Punjab.
Alpharetta is part of Georgia. , is part of Fulton County, Georgia. Georgia is located in the United. Atlanta is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Anderson is part of Lafayette. , is part of Indiana. Lafayette Township is located in the United. Indianapolis is the capital of ,.
Arlington is part of Texas. Texas is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas.
Albany is part of Benton County. Albany is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey. New Jersey is located in the United. New York City is the largest city in ,, Texas. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
Albuquerque is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
Albuquerque is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by New Mexico Senate Assembly of the Punjab. Asians in are an ethnic group in the United States. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is John Sánchez.
Albany is part of Benton County. Albany is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Albuquerque is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Mayor of Albuquerque Assembly of the Punjab. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
Albany is part of the United. Albany is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,.
Angola is part of Indiana. Angola is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Angola is part of of Pleasant. Angola is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Jens Hartel plays for SV Babelsberg. Jens Hartel plays for FC Union Berlin. , plays for FSV Zwickau. The manager of , is Jens Härtel.
Rolando Maran plays for F.C. Bari 1908. Rolando Maran plays for Carrarese Calcio. The manager of , is Rolando Maran. , was born in Italy.
Michele Marcolini plays for Torino F.C.. Michele Marcolini plays for AC Chievo Verona. The manager of , is Michele Marcolini. , was born in Italy.
A.E Dimitra's ground is in Efxeinoupolis. A.E Dimitra play in EPSTH 2nd GROUP A. , has 1500 members. Antonis Milionis is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Stuart Parker plays for Stockport County. A.F.C. Blackpool's ground is in Blackpool. The manager of , is Stuart Parker (footballer). The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Conservative Party (UK).
Stuart Parker plays for Stockport County. A.F.C. Blackpool's ground is in Blackpool. The manager of , is Stuart Parker (footballer). The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Gordon Marsden.
AFC Fylde played in the 2014 season. AFC Fylde's ground is in Warton. The full name of , Verona is "Association Football Club Fylde Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". , has 3180 members.
AFC Fylde played in the 2014 season. AFC Fylde's ground is in Bryning Lane. The full name of , Verona is "Association Football Club Fylde Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". , has 3180 members.
Paulo Sousa plays for Juventus F.C.. Paulo Sousa plays for Maccabi Tel. , plays for Inter Milan. The manager of , is Paulo Sousa.
AEK Athens played in the 2014 season. AEK Athens's ground is in Greece. , play in Superleague Greece A. , has 69618 members.
AFC Ajax's ground is in Sportpark De. Sportpark De Regional Airport owner AFC Ajax, Michigan. , was operated by AFC Ajax. Jong Ajax is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen.
AFC Ajax played in the 2014 season. The full name of AFC Ajax Verona is "Amsterdamsche Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l.". , has 5000 members. , (amateurs) has the nickname "Joden , Godenzonen".
John van den plays for Vitesse Arnhem. John van den plays for AFC Ajax. , plays for Netherlands national football team. The manager of , is John van den Brom.
Estádio Municipal is located in Alagoas. Agremiacao's ground is in Minicipal Coaracy. , play in Campeonato Brasileiro Série C A. The name of the championship football team in the , Premier League Os the Vila Nova Futebol Clube.
Campeonato is located in Brazil. Estádio Municipal is located in Alagoas. ,'s ground is in Estádio Municipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca. , play in Campeonato Brasileiro Série C A.
Campeonato is located in Brazil. Estádio Municipal is located in Arapiraca. ,'s ground is in Estádio Municipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca. , play in Campeonato Brasileiro Série C A.
Akron is part of Summit County. St. Vincent is located in the United. ,'s ground is in St. Vincent–St. Mary High School. , is in the city of Akron, Ohio, New York.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Italy. Rome is the capital of Italy. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Pietro Grasso. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Sergio Mattarella.
Peter Stöger plays for SK Vorwärts. Peter Stöger plays for Admira Wacker. , plays for FK Austria Wien. The manager of , is Peter Stöger.
The runway length of Abilene Regional Airport is 2194.0. 17L/35R. is the runway name of Abilene Regional Airport. , is 546 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas.
The runway length of Adirondack Airport is 2003.0. Adirondack is 507 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Lake Placid, New York. , Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, New York.
Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. The runway length of Adolfo Suárez Airport is 3500.0. 18L/36R is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by ENAIRE A/S.
Agra Airport is located in India. Agra Airport is operated by Indian Air A/S. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is VIAG. , IATA Location Identifier is AGR.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Iraq. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3990.0. 08/26 is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by United States Air Force A/S.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3990.0. 09R/27L is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by United States Air Force A/S.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the Invasion of Grenada. , Air FOrce aircraft fighter is Mc Donnell Douglas F-15 Eagle F-16 Fighting Falcon. The Lockheed AC-130 can be found on , carriers.
Allama Iqbal is located in Pakistan. The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 2900.0. , is operated by Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority A/S. , Airport serves the city of Lahore.
The runway length of Amsterdam Airport Airport is 2014.0. 09/27 Buitenveldertbaan is the runway name of Amsterdam Airport Airport. , is -3.3528 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Amsterdam.
The runway length of Amsterdam Airport Airport is 2014.0. 18L/36R is the runway name of Amsterdam Airport Airport. , is -3.3528 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Amsterdam.
Andrews County is located in Texas. The runway length of Andrews County Airport is 929. , is 973.0 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Andrews, Texas.
Texas is located in the United. Andrews County is located in Texas. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,. , demonym is Tejano.
Texas is located in the United. Andrews County is located in Texas. The English language language is spoken in ,. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,.
Ícolo e bengo is part of of Luanda Province. Ícolo e bengo is located in Angola. , is located in Ícolo e Bengo. , Airport serves the city of Luanda.
The runway length of Antwerp International Airport is 600.0. , is operated by Flemish Government A/S. Antwerp International is 12.0 metres above sea level. , Regional Airport owner Flemish Region, Michigan.
Ashgabat International is operated by Turkmenistan A/S. The headquarters of Turkmenistan Airlines are located in Turkmenistan. The headquarters of , Airlines are located in Ashgabat. The hub airport for , airlines is Turkmenbashi International Airport airport.
Athens International is located in Spata. The runway length of Athens International Airport is 3800.0. , is 94 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Athens.
Egg Harbor is located in the United. , is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey. The leader of Atlantic City is Don Guardian. , Airport serves the city of Atlantic City, New Jersey.
Egg Harbor is located in the United. , is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey. The leader of South Jersey is Stephen Dilts. , Regional Airport owner South Jersey Transportation Authority, Michigan.
Antwerp is located in Belgium. The leader of Belgium is Charles Michel. The German language language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Antwerp.
Antwerp is located in Belgium. The leader of Belgium is Phillipe of. The French language language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Antwerp.
Saranac Lake is part of Harrietstown. , is part of Essex County, New York. Harrietstown is located in the United. , Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, New York.
Fallujah is located in Iraq. The leader of Iraq is is Fuad Masum. The Kurdish languages language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Fallujah.
Fallujah is located in Iraq. The leader of Iraq is Haider al. The Kurdish languages language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Fallujah.
Lahore is located in Pakistan. , is located in Punjab, Pakistan. The leader of Punjab is Malik Muhammad. , Airport serves the city of Lahore.
The 1st runway at Alderney Airport is made from Poaceae. Poaceae belongs to the order of Commelinids. , class is Monocotyledon. , belongs to the division of Flowering plant.
BBC is located in Broadcasting. is Rona Fairhead is the key person for BBC. , is broadcast by BBC. One of the products of , is BBC Radio.
The creator of Bananaman (comics character) is is Steve Bright. Jill Shilling starred in the film Bananaman 6. , first aired 1983-10-03 3rd October 1983. , is broadcast by STV.
The creator of Baymax (comics character) is Duncan Rouleau. Duncan Rouleau is an American. Ryan Potter starred in the film , 6. , is a character in Big Hero 6 (film) 6.
The creator of Bolt (comics character) is Gary. The creator of Bolt (comics character) is by Ernie Colon. The comic character , is also known as Larry Bolatinsky. , is an Puerto Ricans.
Grantville short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: The Bavarian Crisis. DeMarce short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: The Bavarian Crisis. , was born in Burbank, California. Eric Flint is the author of ,: The Baltic War.
A The Ram Rebellion was published in E. 1634: , Crisis has 512 pages. by Eric Flint is the author of The Ram Rebellion: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "1-4165-2060-0-1-4165-4253-7".
AIDS is located in is United. The leader of United kingdom is Elizabeth II. Lippincott Williams & Wilkins for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems. , University is the parent company of the Wolters Kluwer University Press.
A Fortress of was published in hardback. J. V. Jones is the author of Fortress of: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "0-7653-0633-6-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A , is 51969173.
A Loyal Character was published in hardback. Qiu Xiaolong is the author of Loyal Character: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "1-56947-301-3-1-4165-4253-7". The OCLC number of A , is 49805501.
Loyal Character is located in the United. The English language is spoken in Loyal Character. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Soho Press is located in United States. The English language is spoken in United States. Soho Press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
A Wizard of Mars was published in hardback. 1634: , Crisis has 560 pages. Diane Duane is the author of Wizard of Mars: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "978-0-15-204770-2-1-4165-4253-7".
The ISSN number of ACM Acta Mathematica on Information Systems is 0236-8188. ACM Acta Mathematica on Information Systems has the abbreviation is Acta Math. Inf. Syst. ACM , on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Mathematics Science. 83646315 is the LCCN number of ACM , on Information Systems.
The ISSN number of ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems is 0567-7920-8188. ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems has the abbreviation is Acta Palaeontol. Inf. Syst. ACM , on Information Systems is part of the academic Discipline Paleobiology Science. 60040714 is the LCCN number of ACM , on Information Systems.
Polish Academy for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Acta Palaeontologica on information Systems. The ISSN number of ACM Acta Palaeontologica on Information Systems is 1732-8188. ACM , on Information Systems has the abbreviation Acta Palaeontol. Pol.. Inf. Syst. 60040714 is the LCCN number of ACM , on Information Systems.
by Cornell for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Administrative on information Systems. , is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land-grant Universities of American Universities. , is affiliated with the Association of American Universities of American Universities. Cornell University is in New York, Sri Lanka.
by Cornell for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Administrative on information Systems. , is in the city of Ithaca, New York, New York. , is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land-grant Universities of American Universities. Cornell University is in New York, Sri Lanka.
A Aenir was published in paperback. 1634: , Crisis has 233 pages. is Garth Nix is the author of Aenir: The Baltic War. 1634: , Crisis can be located by it's ISBN number "0-439-17684-0-1-4165-4253-7".
Alcatraz Versus is located in the United. The English language is spoken in Alcatraz Versus. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Johns Hopkins is located in the United. Johns Hopkins for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM American Journal on information Systems. , University is the parent company of the Johns Hopkins University University Press. , (journal) was first published in 1878.
Alcatraz Versus is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
severed wasp is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Alan Bean is an the United. , spent 100305.0(minutes) in space. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , was chosen by NASA in 1963.
Alan Shepard served as a crew member of Apollo 14. Apollo 14 was operated by NASA. The number of ,'s awards are Distinguished Service Medal (United States Navy). the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal.
William Anders was born in British Hong. William Anders served as a crew member of Apollo. Frank Borman was a member of the crew on ,. Chris Patten served as a representative of , Kong.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , is Retired. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is Buzz Aldrin Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. Buzz Aldrin was a test pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was chosen by NASA in 1963.
Buzz Aldrin served as a crew member of Apollo 11. Apollo 11 was operated by NASA. The number of ,'s awards are 20. ,'s full name was "Edwin Eugene Aldrin Jr. Bean".
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. The number of Alan Shepard's awards are Distinguished. the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal. , Powys died in California.
The number of Alan Shepard's awards are Distinguished. The Senator representing California was Dianne Feinstein. the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal. , Powys died in California.
Elliot See is an the United. Elliot See was born in Dallas. University of Texas at Austin is , Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in St. Louis.
William Anders was a test pilot. William Anders served as a crew member of Apollo. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. , was operated by NASA.
AWH Engineering is located in India. AWH Engineering is in the city of Kuttikkattoor, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2001-07-11. The Ganges is a river in ,.
Acharya Institute is located in India. Visvesvaraya is in the city of Belgaum, New York. , is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University of American Universities. The campus address for the , of Technology is: In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090., Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore - 560090.
Acharya Institute is located in India. Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. , is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University of American Universities. Dr. Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar is the director of the , of Technology.
All India Council is located in Mumbai. The sport Tennis has a Governing Body called the International Tennis Federation. Tennis is one of the sports offered at the , of Technology. The All India Council for Technical Education for Technical Education was proud to give the Technical Campus status to the , of Technology.
Alba Iulia is part of of Alba County. 1 Decembrie is located in Romania. Bucharest is the capital of ,. , is in the city of Alba Iulia, New York.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. , is governed by the Magistrate and County Council.
The leader of Kerala is Kochi. , is in the city of Kuttikkattoor, New York. The academic staff at the , College number 250. AWH Engineering is in Kerala, Sri Lanka.
1 Decembrie is located in Romania. Bucharest is the capital of ,. Germans are an ethnic group in the Romania. The anthem of , is called Deșteaptă-te, române! te romane.
Alba Iulia is located in Romania. The leader of Romania is Klaus Iohannis. Bucharest is the capital of ,. , is in the city of Alba Iulia, New York.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. tomatoes is an ingredient in Amatriciana. The main ingredients of , are Tomatoes, guanciale, cheese, olive oil rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Lazio.
Arrabbiata is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is Pietro Grasso. The leader of , is Sergio Mattarella. Rome is the capital of ,.
Arros negre is located in Spain. Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arros negre. The main ingredients of , are White rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Catalonia.
Arros negre is located in Spain. White rice is an ingredient in Arros negre. The main ingredients of , are White rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Catalonia.
Arros negre is located in Spain. The leader of Catalonia are is Parliament. Spaniards are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Catalonia.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is. Batak are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Sumatra.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. Minangkabau are an ethnic group in the Sumatra. Malays (ethnic group) are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Sumatra.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. The leader of United States is John Roberts. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Bacon sandwich is located in is United. Ketchup is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. , is a variation of Club sandwich. , is a variation of BLT.
Bacon sandwich is located in is United. condiments is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. The main ingredients of , are Bread and bacon, with a condiment, often ketchup or brown sauce rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. The comic character , is also known as Bacon butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon sanger, piece 'n bacon, bacon cob, bacon barm, bacon muffin.
Baked Alaska is located in the United. , is a variation of Cookie. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , is Dessert.
Baked Alaska is located in the United. with sponge is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. The main ingredients of , are Meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Paris, New York or Hong Kong.
Baked Alaska is located in France. Meringue is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. The main ingredients of , are Meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Hong Kong.
Baked Alaska is located in the United. Ice cream is an ingredient in Baked Alaska. The main ingredients of , are Meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Hong Kong.
Derbyshire is part of Derbyshire. Fruit preserves is an ingredient in Bakewell tart. , is a variation of Bakewell tart. , is located in the region Derbyshire Dales.
bakso is located in Indonesia. Tapioca is an ingredient in bakso. The main ingredients of , are Ground beef, tapioca, noodle, rice vermicelli, beef broth, kailan, celery, salted vegetables, fried shallots rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Nationwide in Indonesia, also popular in neighboring Southeast Asian countries.
bakso is located in Indonesia. noodles is an ingredient in bakso. The main ingredients of , are Ground beef, tapioca, noodle, rice vermicelli, beef broth, kailan, celery, salted vegetables, fried shallots rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Indonesia.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine. Kidney beans is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa. The main ingredients of , are red beans, pork belly, white rice, ground meat, chicharon, fried egg, plantain (patacones), chorizo, arepa, hogao sauce, black pudding (morcilla), avocado and lemon rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Paisa Region.
Bandeja paisa is located in Colombian cuisine. Hogao is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa. The main ingredients of , are red beans, pork belly, white rice, ground meat, chicharon, fried egg, plantain (patacones), chorizo, arepa, hogao sauce, black pudding (morcilla), avocado and lemon rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Paisa Region.
Barny cakes is located in France. The leader of France is Gerard Larcher. The leader of , is François Hollande. The French language language is spoken in ,.
Batagor is located in Indonesia. Shiitake is an ingredient in Shumai. , is a variation of Siomay. , is a variation of Shumai.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. Pork is an ingredient in Batchoy. The main ingredients of , are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp, beef rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region La Paz, Iloilo City.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. chicken is an ingredient in Batchoy. The main ingredients of , are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp, beef rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is Soup.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore. Sesame oil is an ingredient in Beef kway teow. The main ingredients of , are Kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, sliced, dried black beans, garlic, dark soy sauce, lengkuas, oyster sauce, soya sauce, chilli and sesame oil rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Nationwide in Singapore and Indonesia.
Beef kway teow is located in Singapore and. The leader of Singapore is Halimah Yacob. The Standard Chinese language is spoken in ,. , is located in the region Singapore.
Beef kway teow is located in Indonesia. Sesame oil is an ingredient in Beef kway teow. The main ingredients of , are Kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, sliced, dried black beans, garlic, dark soy sauce, lengkuas, oyster sauce, soya sauce, chilli and sesame oil rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Singapore.
Bhajji is located in India. vegetables is an ingredient in Bhajji. The comic character , is also known as Bhaji, bajji. , is located in the region Karnataka.
vegetables is an ingredient in Bhajji. The main ingredients of , are Gram flour, vegetables rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. The comic character , is also known as Bhaji, bajji. Bhajji is located in the region Karnataka.
sweet potato is an ingredient in Binignit is. The main ingredients of Binignit is are Sago rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , belongs to the order of Solanales. , belongs to the division of Flowering plant.
Binignit is is located in Philippines. Sago is an ingredient in Binignit is. The main ingredients of , are Coconut milk rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Visayas.
Bionico is located in Mexico. Granola is an ingredient in Bionico. , is Dessert. , is located in the region Jalisco.
Bionico is located in Mexico. sour cream is an ingredient in Bionico. The main ingredients of , are Chopped Fruits, Sour Cream, Condensed Milk, Granola, Shredded Coconut, Raisins rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Guadalajara.
Bionico is located in Mexico. The leader of Mexico is Silvano Aureoles Conejo. , is a variation of Cookie. , is Dessert.
bakso is located in Indonesia. Tapioca is an ingredient in ,. The leader of Indonesia is Jusuf Kalla. , is located in the region Indonesia.
ayam penyet is located in Java. The leader of Singapore is Tony Tan. Baduy are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Singapore.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. The Philippine language is spoken in Philippines. Ilocano people are an ethnic group in the ,. Zamboangans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. The Arabic language is spoken in Philippines. Zamboangans are an ethnic group in the ,. Igorot people are an ethnic group in the ,.
Binignit is is located in Philippines. The Philippines language is spoken in Philippines. , is a variation of Cookie. , is Dessert.
Binignit is is located in Philippines. The Philippines language is spoken in Philippines. , is a variation of Sandesh (confectionery). , is Dessert.
The English language is spoken in Ring of Fire. Grantville short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: The Bavarian Crisis. The Grantville Gazette short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: , Crisis. Virginia De Marce and Eric Flint is the author of ,: The Baltic War. the novel 1634: , Crisis is followed by Ring of Fire II II.
by Cornell for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM Administrative on information Systems. Cornell University is in the city of Ithaca, New York. , is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land-grant Universities of American Universities. , is affiliated with the Association of American Universities of American Universities. The president of , is Elizabeth Garrett.
Loyal Character is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Soho Press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Loyal Character is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Soho Press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Soho Press is located in United States. The English language is spoken in United States. Soho Press for Computing Machinery is the publisher of ACM , on information Systems. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
severed wasp is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Into Battle is located in Australia. Aenir short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: Above the Veil Crisis. Castle (novel) short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: , Crisis. the novel 1634: , Crisis is followed by The Violet Keystone II. the novel 1634: , Crisis is followed by Into Battle (novel) II.
severed wasp is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
severed wasp is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
The Ram Rebellion is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. 1634: The Galileo Affair short stories in the Grantville Gazettes preceded 1634: , Crisis.
The Ram Rebellion is located in the United. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Wizard of Mars is located in the United. The English language is spoken in United States. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. The , language is spoken Great Britain.
Albany is part of Georgia. Albany is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Alpharetta is part of Georgia. , is part of Fulton County, Georgia. Alpharetta is located in the United. Atlanta is the largest city in ,, Texas. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,.
Amarillo is part of Potter County. Texas is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. , is in Texas, Sri Lanka.
Amarillo is part of Potter County. Amarillo is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,. , is in Texas, Sri Lanka.
Amarillo is part of Potter County. Potter County is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,. , is in Texas, Sri Lanka.
Anderson is part of Fall Creek. , is part of Anderson Township, Madison County, Indiana. Fall Creek is located in the United. The total population density of ,, Texas is 429.9 523.9 (inhabitants per square kilometre) per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 107.43 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California. Antioch is part of California. , is part of San Francisco Bay Area. The English language language is spoken in ,. The ,, Pakistan, is led by California's 11th State Assembly district Assembly of the Punjab.
Atlanta is part of of DeKalb County. The total population density of Atlanta, Texas is 429.9 1299.0 inhabitants per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 347.1 (square kilometres) kilometres. The area code of ,, Indiana is 404. The land area, of , (New Mexico), is 344.9 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Attica is part of the United. Attica is part of Logan Township. The total population density of ,, Texas is 429.9 783.1 (inhabitants per square kilometre) per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 4.14 (square kilometres) kilometres. ,, Georgia is located at 166.0 above sea level.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. Alabama is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , is in Alabama, Sri Lanka.
Auburn is part of of Pierce County. , is part of King County, Washington. Auburn is located in the United. The total population density of ,, Texas is 429.9 914.8 (inhabitants per square kilometre) per sq km. ,, in Indiana, has a total area of 77.41 (square kilometres) kilometres.
Austin is part of Texas. Austin is part of Williamson. The English language language is spoken in ,. Round Rock, Texas is the largest city in ,, Texas. Georgetown, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Austin is part of Texas. Austin is part of Hays County. The English language language is spoken in ,. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas. San Marcos, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Austin is part of Texas. Austin is part of Hays County. The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas. San Marcos, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Alexandria is part of Indiana. , is part of Madison County, Indiana. Indiana is located in the United. The English Americans language is spoken in ,. Indianapolis is the capital of ,.
Arlington is part of of Tarrant. Arlington is part of Texas. The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. Houston is the largest city in ,, Texas. Fort Worth, Texas is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Arlington is part of of Tarrant. , is part of Texas. Texas is located in the United. Fort Worth, Texas is the largest city in ,, Texas. Austin, Texas is the capital of ,.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey. New Jersey is located in the United. New York City is the largest city in ,, Texas. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. White Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Albany is part of Linn County. Albany is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Albany is part of Oregon. Albany is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Angola is part of Steuben County. Angola is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. Lee County is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. , is in Alabama, Sri Lanka.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama. , is part of Alabama. Lee County is located in the United. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. Opelika, Alabama is the County seat of ,, in Indiana.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey. New Jersey is located in the United. Newark, New Jersey is the largest city in ,, Texas. Trenton, New Jersey is the capital of ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,.
Albuquerque is part of New Mexico. Albuquerque is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
Angola is part of Steuben County. Angola is located in the United. The English language language is spoken in ,. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
Akron is part of Summit County. Akron is located in the United. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans in the United States are an ethnic group in the ,. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Barack Obama.
Albany is part of the United. Albany is located in the United. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. African Americans are an ethnic group in the ,. , demonym is Americans.
11th Mississippi is located in United States. 11th Mississippi is located in Seminary Ridge. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. The , Infantry Monument is in the municipality of Gettysburg, Pennsylvania , Pennsylvania. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Contributing property property.
11th Mississippi is located in Adams County. Adams County, Pennsylvania has Cumberland County, Pennsylvania to its north. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Contributing property property. Frederick County, Maryland County, Maryland is to the southwest of ,, Pennsylvania. ,  has to its southeast  Carroll County, Maryland
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Prime Minister of Azerbaijan Assembly of the Punjab. Baku is the capital of ,. , Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. Baku is the capital of ,. The National Assembly (Azerbaijan) dictates the legislature of ,. , Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The Turkey, Pakistan, is led by President of Assembly of the Punjab. Istanbul is the largest city in ,, Texas. Ankara is the capital of ,. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Ahmet Davutoğlu.
AWH Engineering is in the city of Kuttikkattoor, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2001-07-11. The academic staff at the , College number 250. AWH Engineering is in Kerala, Sri Lanka. ,  has to its northwest  Mahé, India
Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. Acharya Institute is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya of American Universities. The number of post graduate students at the , of Technology is about 700. Dr. Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar is the director of the , of Technology. The campus address for the , of Technology is: In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090., Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore - 560090.
Acharya Institute is located in India. Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. , is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University of American Universities. The number of post graduate students at the , of Technology is about 700. The president of , is B.M. Reddy.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Monarchy of Denmark Assembly of the Punjab. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels.
AWH Engineering is located in India. Mumbai is the largest city in Indian, Texas. , is in the city of Kuttikkattoor, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2001-07-11. The academic staff at the , College number 250.
AWH Engineering is located in India. The leader of Kerala is Kochi. Mumbai is the largest city in ,, Texas. , is in Kerala, Sri Lanka. The Ganges is a river in ,.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. The academic staff at the , College number 737. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11.
School of Business is in the city of Aarhus, New York. School of Business is affiliated with the European University of American Universities. , has to its northeast Mols. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels. , is governed by the Magistrate and County Council.
The creator of Baymax (comics character) is Duncan Rouleau. The creator of Baymax (comics character) is Steve T. Seagle. , is an Americans. Alan Tudyk starred in the film , 6. , is a character in Big Hero 6 (film) 6.
Michele Marcolini plays for F.C. Bari 1908. Michele Marcolini plays for for Vicenza. ,'s ground is in Italy. The manager of , is Michele Marcolini. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Pietro Grasso.
Stuart Parker plays for Chesterfield. Stuart Parker plays for Stockport County. ,'s ground is in Blackpool. The manager of , is Stuart Parker (footballer). The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Labour Party (UK).
The Italian language is spoken in Italy. A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Italy. , play in Serie D A. The name of the championship football team in the , Premier League Os the S.S. Robur Siena. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Sergio Mattarella.
Gus Poyet plays for is Real Zaragoza. , plays for Chelsea F.C.. Olympic Stadium is located in Marousi. ,'s ground is in Olympic Stadium (Athens). The manager of , is Gus Poyet.
The Italian language is spoken in Italy. ,'s ground is in Italy. Rome is the capital of Italy. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Pietro Grasso. , demonym is Italians.
A.S. Gubbio's ground is in Italy. Rome is the capital of Italy. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Sergio Mattarella. , demonym is Italians. Italian language is the official language of ,.
Arem is located in Indonesia. The leader of Indonesia is Jusuf Kalla. The Indonesian language language is spoken in ,. The currency in , is Indonesian rupiah. , is located in the region Nationwide in Indonesia, but more specific to Java.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. Kuala Lumpur is the capital of ,. Malaysian Chinese are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is. Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Sumatra and Malay Peninsula.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. Kuala Lumpur is the capital of ,. Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is. Malaysian Indian are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Sumatra and Malay Peninsula.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. Kuala Lumpur is the capital of ,. Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the Malaysia is. Malaysian Indian are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Sumatra.
Asam pedas is located in Malaysia. The leader of Malaysia is is Abu Zahar Ujang. Malaysian Malay are an ethnic group in the ,. Malaysian Indian are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Malay Peninsula.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. bacon is an ingredient in Bacon Explosion. The main ingredients of , are Bacon,sausage rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. The main ingredients of , are Sausage rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is located in the region Kansas City metropolitan area.
Bacon Explosion is located in the United. The leader of United States is is Paul. The English language language is spoken in ,. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. White Americans are an ethnic group in the ,.
Bacon sandwich is located in is United. Ketchup is an ingredient in Bacon sandwich. The main ingredients of , are Bread and bacon, with a condiment, often ketchup or brown sauce rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is a variation of BLT. The comic character , is also known as Bacon butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon sanger, piece 'n bacon, bacon cob, bacon barm, bacon muffin.
Baked Alaska is located in France. The leader of France is Manual Valls. The leader of , is Gérard Larcher. The French language language is spoken in ,. , is located in the region Hong Kong.
Antioquia Department is located in Colombia. Lemon is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa. , is part of the Rutaceae family. , belongs to the order of Rosids. , is located in the region Antioquia Department.
Barny cakes is located in France. Sponge cake is an ingredient in ,. The leader of France is Gerard Larcher. The leader of , is François Hollande. The French language language is spoken in ,.
Batagor is located in Indonesia. Peanut sauce is an ingredient in ,. The leader of Indonesia is is Joko Widodo. , is a variation of Siomay. , is a variation of Shumai.
Batagor is located in Indonesia. Shiitake is an ingredient in ,. The leader of Indonesia is is Joko Widodo. , is a variation of Siomay. , is a variation of Shumai.
Batagor is located in Indonesia. Shiitake is an ingredient in ,. The leader of Indonesia is Jusuf Kalla. , is a variation of Shumai. , is a variation of Siomay.
Bhajji is located in India. Gram flour is an ingredient in Bhajji. The main ingredients of , are Gram flour, vegetables rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. The comic character , is also known as Bhaji, bajji. , is located in the region Karnataka.
Bhajji is located in India. The leader of Indian is T. S. Thakur. The leader of , is Vajubhai Vala. , demonym is Indian people. , is located in the region Karnataka.
Bhajji is located in India. The leader of Indian is T. S. Thakur. The leader of , is Sumitra Mahajan. , demonym is Indian people. , is located in the region Karnataka.
Bionico is located in Mexico. sour cream is an ingredient in Bionico. The main ingredients of , are Chopped Fruits, Sour Cream, Condensed Milk, Granola, Shredded Coconut, Raisins rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. , is Dessert. , is located in the region Guadalajara.
Bionico is located in Mexico. The leader of Mexico is Enrique Pena. The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. , is a variation of Honey. , is Dessert.
Bionico is located in Mexico. The leader of Mexico is Silvano Aureoles Conejo. , is a variation of Honey. , is Dessert. , is located in the region Jalisco.
Arros negre is located in Spain. The leader of Catalonia are is Carles Puigdemont. The leader of , is Felipe VI of Spain. Spaniards are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Catalonia.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is is Matteo Renzi. The leader of , is Laura Boldrini. The Italian language language is spoken in ,. Rome is the capital of ,.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is Sergio Mattarella. The leader of , is Laura Boldrini. Rome is the capital of ,. , demonym is Italians.
Amatriciana is located in Italy. The leader of Italy is Pietro Grasso. The leader of , is Matteo Renzi. The Italian language language is spoken in ,. Rome is the capital of ,.
ayam penyet is located in Java. fried chicken is an ingredient in ayam penyet. The main ingredients of , are Chicken rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink, cubanelle peppers. Javanese people are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Nationwide, also can be found in Malaysia and Singapore.
ayam penyet is located in Java. The leader of Singapore is Tony Tan. The English language language is spoken in ,. Javanese people are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Singapore.
Batchoy is located in Philippines. The Arabic language is spoken in Philippines. The Philippine Spanish language is spoken in ,. Zamboangans are an ethnic group in the ,. Chinese Filipino are an ethnic group in the ,.
Ajoblanco are is located in Spain. The leader of Andalusia is Susana. The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. Spaniards are an ethnic group in the ,. , is located in the region Andalusia.
Ajoblanco are is located in Spain. The leader of Spain is Felipe. The leader of , is Susana Díaz. , demonym is Spaniards. , is located in the region Andalusia.
Alan Bean is an the United. , was a Test pilot. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. , is Retired.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. Alan Shepard served as a crew member of Apollo 14. , was operated by NASA. The number of ,'s awards are Distinguished Service Medal (United States Navy). the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal.
William Anders is an the United. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. , was operated by NASA. , was commanded by Frank Borman.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1930-01-20. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. Buzz Aldrin was a test pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , is Retired. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. Buzz Aldrin served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA. , is Retired. ,'s backup pilot was William Anders.
Buzz Aldrin was born on the 15th of March 20,1930. Buzz Aldrin served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA. , is Retired. ,'s backup pilot was William Anders.
Alan Shepard served as a crew member of Apollo 14. Apollo 14 was operated by NASA. The Senator representing , was Dianne Feinstein. , Powys died in California. ,  gemstone  Benitoite
Alan Shepard is an the United. Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. The number of ,'s awards are Distinguished Service Medal (United States Navy). the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal. , Powys died in California.
William Anders is an the United. , retired on 1969-09-01 1981. , was a Fighter pilot. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8.
Tirstrup is is part of Central Denmark. Tirstrup is is located in Denmark. , is located in Tirstrup. The leader of , is Margrethe II of Denmark. The Faroese language language is spoken in ,.
Adolfo Suárez is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. The runway length of Adolfo Suárez Airport is 4100.0. 14L/32R is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by ENAIRE A/S. , is 610.0 metres above sea level.
Agra Airport is located in India. The runway length of Agra Airport Airport is 1818.0. , is operated by Indian Air Force A/S. , is 167.94 metres above sea level. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is VIAG.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Iraq. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3990.0. 08/26 is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by United States Air Force A/S. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is ORAA.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase Airport is 3992.88. 08/26 is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by United States Air Force A/S. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is ORAA.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the 1986 United States bombing of Libya Grenada. , Air FOrce aircraft fighter is General Dynamics F-16 Fighting Falcon F-16 Fighting Falcon. The Boeing C-17 Globemaster III Globemaster III is a transport aircraft in the , Force. The Lockheed AC-130 can be found on , carriers.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by United States A/S. One of the noted United States Air Force battles was the Invasion of Grenada. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Operation Enduring Freedom Grenada. The Lockheed C-130 Hercules Globemaster III is a transport aircraft in the , Force. The Lockheed AC-130 can be found on , carriers.
The runway length of Alderney Airport Airport is 733.0. 08/26 is the runway name of Alderney Airport Airport. , is 88.0 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Alderney. The 1st runway at , is made from Poaceae.
Allama Iqbal is located in Pakistan. The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 3310.0. 18L/36R is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority A/S. , Airport serves the city of Lahore.
Allama Iqbal is located in Punjab Pakistan. The runway length of Allama Iqbal Airport is 2900.0. 18R/36L is the runway name of , Airport. , is operated by Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority A/S. , Airport serves the city of Lahore.
Maple Ridge is located in the United. Alpena County is located in Maple Ridge. The runway length of , Airport is 1533.0. , is 210 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Alpena, Michigan.
Alpena County is located in Maple Ridge. The runway length of Alpena County Airport is 1533.0. 7/25 is the runway name of , Airport. , is 210 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Alpena, Michigan.
Alpena County is located in Wilson. The runway length of Alpena County Airport is 2744.0. 1/19 is the runway name of , Airport. , is 210 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Alpena, Michigan.
Wilson Township is located in the United. Alpena County is located in Wilson. The runway length of , Airport is 1533.0. , is 210 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Alpena, Michigan.
Angola International is located in Ícolo e Bengo. The runway length of Angola International Airport is 3800.0. 05L/23R is the runway name of , Airport. , is 159 metres above sea level. , Airport serves the city of Luanda.
Athens is located in Greece. The leader of Greece is Alexis Tsipras. The leader of , is Nikos Voutsis. The Greek language language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Athens.
Athens is located in Greece. The leader of Greece is Alexis Tsipras. The leader of , is Prokopis Pavlopoulos. The Greek language language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Athens.
Egg Harbor is part of New Jersey. Egg Harbor is located in the United. , is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey. The leader of , is Don Guardian. , Airport serves the city of Atlantic City, New Jersey.
Antwerp is located in Belgium. The leader of Belgium is Phillipe of. The leader of , is Charles Michel. City of Brussels is the capital of ,. , Airport serves the city of Antwerp.
Egg Harbor is part of New Jersey. , is part of Atlantic County, New Jersey. Egg Harbor is located in the United. , is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey. The ICAO Location Identifier of , is KACY.
Saranac Lake is part of Harrietstown. , is part of New York. Harrietstown is located in the United. , Airport serves the city of Lake Placid, New York. , Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, New York.
Saranac Lake is part of Harrietstown. , is part of Essex County, New York. Harrietstown is located in the United. , Airport serves the city of Lake Placid, New York. , Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, New York.
Uttar Pradesh is part of Awadh. Uttar Pradesh is part of Bundelkhand. , is located in Uttar Pradesh. , is operated by Indian Air Force A/S. , Force has an aircraft-capable helicopter known as the HAL HAL Light Combat Helicopter Helicopter.
Uttar Pradesh is part of Bundelkhand. , is located in Uttar Pradesh. The leader of Uttar Pradesh is Ram Naik. , is operated by Indian Air Force A/S. , Force has an aircraft-capable helicopter known as the HAL HAL Light Combat Helicopter Helicopter.
Fallujah is located in Iraq. The leader of Iraq is Haider al. The leader of , is Fuad Masum. The Arabic language is spoken in ,. , Airport serves the city of Fallujah.
Cleveland is is part of Cuyahoga County. , is part of Ohio. Cleveland is is located in the United. , is located in Cleveland. , was completed in 1985.
250 Delaware is located in Buffalo. There are 12 floors at , Row. The architectural style of the , Hall is Postmodern architecture. January 2014 was the start date for the building at 250 Delaware Row. , Street has a floor area of 30843.8 (square metres) metres.
Chicago is part of Illinois. Chicago is located in the United. , is located in Chicago. The leader of , is Rahm Emanuel. Springfield, Illinois is the capital of ,.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Margrethe II. The Faroese language language is spoken in ,. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen. , was founded in Washington, D.C., D.C.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Denmark. The Greenlandic language is spoken in Denmark. Bill Marriott is the key person for ,. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen. , was founded in Washington, D.C., D.C.
AC Hotel Bella is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. The Greenlandic language language is spoken in ,. Marriott International is the tenant of , Sky Copenhagen. , was founded in Washington, D.C., D.C.
Adare Manor is located in Republic of. The leader of Republic of is is Enda Kenny. Augustus Pugin is the architect of ,. , was born in Bloomsbury. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Palace of Westminster.
Addis Ababa was completed in 1964. 1961 was the start date for the building at Addis Ababa Row. , Street has a floor area of 140000.0 (square metres) metres. The 320 , Building 42 m. The Government of Addis Ababa of , is the current tenant of the Addis Ababa City Hall.
Akita Museum is located in Japan. Akita Museum is located in Akita. , is located in Akita Prefecture. There are 3 floors at , Row. , is located on 1-4-2 Nakadori's Monastery, Adisham, Haputhale, Sri Lanka.
Akita is part of Akita Prefecture. Akita Museum is located in Japan. , is located in Akita, Akita. The leader of , is Tarō Asō. Chinese people in Japan are an ethnic group in the ,.
Mason School is located in the United. Alan B. Miller is located in Virginia. Robert A. M. Stern is the architect of ,. , Regional Airport owner College of William & Mary, Michigan. The Mason School of Business of , is the current tenant of the Addis Ababa City Hall.
Ahmedabad is is located in India. , is located in Ahmedabad. , is located in Gujarat. The leader of Indian is Sumitra Mahajan. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Gujarat Legislative Assembly Assembly of the Punjab.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka. The leader of Sri Lanka is Ranil Wickremesinghe. The leader of , is Austin Fernando. , is in Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, Sri Lanka. , is located in the region Ampara District.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka. The leader of Sri Lanka is Ranil Wickremesinghe. Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte is the capital of ,. ,'s governing body is Eastern Provincial Council City Council. , is in Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, Sri Lanka.
Julia Morgan is the architect of Asilomar Conference. Julia Morgan was born in San Francisco. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Los Angeles Herald-Examiner. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Asilomar State Beach. Hearst Castle was a significant project of ,.
Julia Morgan is the architect of Asilomar Conference. Julia Morgan was born in San Francisco. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Riverside Art Museum. One of the significant buildings designed by , is the Asilomar State Beach. Hearst Castle was a significant project of ,.
New York City is part of Manhattan. , is part of New Netherland. New York City is located in the United. , is located in New York City. The leader of , is Cyrus Vance, Jr..
The leader of Birmingham is John. John Madin is the architect of 103 Colmore. , was born in Birmingham. ,'s governing body is Birmingham City Council City Council. ,, California has postal codes B postcode area.
, is located in United States. The leader of United States is John Roberts. The leader of United States is Barack Obama. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of the United States Assembly of the Punjab. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,.
11th Mississippi is located in United States. 11th Mississippi is located in Seminary Ridge. , is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Contributing property property. , is in Pennsylvania, Sri Lanka.
11th Mississippi is located in Adams County. Adams County Pennsylvania is East of Franklin County, Pennsylvania. ,, Pennsylvania has Cumberland County, Pennsylvania County, Pennsylvania to its north. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Contributing property property. Frederick County, Maryland County, Maryland is to the southwest of ,, Pennsylvania. ,  has to its southeast  Carroll County, Maryland
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. Baku is the capital of Azerbaijan. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Artur Rasizade. The , Plack is made from Red granite and white marble. , Martyrs Memorial designer was Hüseyin Bütüner and Hilmi Güner Bütüner and Hilmi Güner. , Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku.
Baku Turkish is located in Azerbaijan. The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The , Plack is made from Red granite and white marble. , Martyrs Memorial designer was Hüseyin Bütüner and Hilmi Güner Bütüner and Hilmi Güner. , Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. Türk Şehitleri Anıtı Force Station is the native name of ,.
14th New Jersey is located in United States. Monocacy National is located in Frederick. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1907-07-11-07-11. The , Infantry Monument falls under the category of Historic districts in the United States property. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the district of the Monocacy National Battlefield Battlefield. , is in Maryland, Sri Lanka.
Alan Bean is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1932-03-15. , spent 100305.0(minutes) in space. , was a Test pilot. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , is Retired.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. Alan Shepard served as a crew member of Apollo 14. , was operated by NASA. The number of ,'s awards are Distinguished Service Medal (United States Navy). the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal. , Powys died in California.
Alan Bean retired on June 1981. Alan Bean served as a crew member of Apollo 12. , was operated by NASA. ,'s full name was "Alan La Vern Bean Bean". ,'s backup pilot was Alfred Worden. , was commanded by David Scott.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin was born on the 15th of March 20,1930. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA. ,'s backup pilot was William Anders. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA. ,'s backup pilot was William Anders.
Buzz Aldrin was born on the 15th of March 20,1930. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
The number of Alan Shepard's awards are Distinguished. Smilodon is a fossil from California. The Senator representing , was Dianne Feinstein. the , service medal from the Navy is higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal of commerce gold medal. , Powys died in California. ,  gemstone  Benitoite
William Anders is an the United. , retired on 1969-09-01 1981. , was a Fighter pilot. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. AFIT, M.S. 1962 is , Johnson's almaMater.
William Anders retired on 1969 1981. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. , was operated by NASA. ,'s backup pilot was Buzz Aldrin. Frank Borman was a member of the crew on ,.
William Anders served as a crew member of Apollo. , was operated by NASA. , is Retired. ,'s backup pilot was Buzz Aldrin. Frank Borman was a member of the crew on ,. AFIT is William Anders Johnson's almaMater.
Accademia di is located in Switzerland. Accademia di is located in Ticino. , is in the city of Mendrisio, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1996-07-11. The academic staff at the , College number 100. The dean of the , Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta.
Acharya Institute is located in India. , is in the city of Bangalore, New York. , is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University of American Universities. The number of post graduate students at the , of Technology is about 700. Acharya Institute is in Karnataka, Sri Lanka. The campus address for the , of Technology is: In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090., Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore - 560090.
Acharya Institute is located in India. Acharya Institute is in the city of Bangalore, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. , is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University of American Universities. The president of , is B.M. Reddy. The campus address for the , of Technology is: In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090., Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore - 560090.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Monarchy of Denmark Assembly of the Punjab. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. In , the main religion is the Church of Denmark. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. The dean of the , Architettura di Mendrisio is Thomas Pallesen. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels.
AWH Engineering is located in India. The leader of Kerala is Kochi. Mumbai is the largest city in ,, Texas. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2001-07-11. , is in Kerala, Sri Lanka. The Ganges is a river in ,.
1 Decembrie is located in Romania. The leader of Romania is Klaus Iohannis. Bucharest is the capital of ,. Germans of Romania are an ethnic group in the ,. The anthem of , is called Deșteaptă-te, române! te romane. The patron Saint of , is Andrew the Apostle Apostle.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. The academic staff at the , College number 737. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11. There are 16000 students at the , Architettura di Mendrisio.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The leader of Turkey is is Ahmet Davutoglu. Istanbul is the largest city in ,, Texas. Ankara is the capital of ,. The , Plack is made from Bronze. The currency in , is Turkish lira. , Hall was in augurated on 1932-07-27-10-02.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The Turkey, Pakistan, is led by President of Assembly of the Punjab. Ankara is the capital of ,. The leader, of , (New Mexico), is Ahmet Davutoğlu. , Martyrs Memorial designer was Pietro Canonica Bütüner and Hilmi Güner. The , Plack is made from Bronze. , Hall was in augurated on 1932-07-27-10-02.
Ataturk Monument is located in Turkey. The leader of Turkey is is Ahmet Davutoglu. The ,, Pakistan, is led by President of Turkey Assembly of the Punjab. Istanbul is the largest city in ,, Texas. Ankara is the capital of ,. The currency in , is Turkish lira. , Hall was in augurated on 1932-07-27-10-02.
Accademia di is located in Switzerland. The Switzerland, Pakistan, is led by Federal Chancellor Assembly of the Punjab. , is in the city of Mendrisio, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1996-07-11. The academic staff at the , College number 100. There are 600 students at the , Architettura di Mendrisio. The dean of the , Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta.
Acharya Institute is located in India. , is in the city of Bangalore, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 2000-07-11. The president of , is B.M. Reddy. Dr. Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar is the director of the , of Technology. , of Technology's motto is Nurturing Excellence. Acharya Institute is in Karnataka, Sri Lanka.
All India Council is located in Mumbai. , Pennsylvania is East of Arabian Sea County, Pennsylvania. , has to its northeast Telangana. The sport , has a Governing Body called the International Tennis Federation Tennis Federation. Tennis is one of the sports offered at the , of Technology. The All India Council for Technical Education for Technical Education was proud to give the Technical Campus status to the , of Technology. Acharya Institute is in Karnataka, Sri Lanka.
Alba Iulia is located in Romania. The leader of Romania is Klaus Iohannis. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Prime Minister of Romania Assembly of the Punjab. Bucharest is the capital of ,. Germans of Romania are an ethnic group in the ,. , is in the city of Alba Iulia, New York. The anthem of , is called Deșteaptă-te, române! te romane.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. The academic staff at the , College number 737. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. The dean of the , Architettura di Mendrisio is Thomas Pallesen.
School of Business is located in Denmark. The leader of Denmark is Lars Løkke. The ,, Pakistan, is led by Monarchy of Denmark Assembly of the Punjab. , is in the city of Aarhus, New York. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. The headquarters of the , Association is in Brussels. , is governed by the Magistrate and County Council.
School of Business is located in Denmark. School of Business is in the city of Aarhus, New York. The , Volunteer Infantry Monument was established in 1928-07-11. , is affiliated with the European University Association of American Universities. The Latin name of the , 1918 University is "Universitas Aarhusiensis Apulensis". There are 16000 students at the , Architettura di Mendrisio. The dean of the , Architettura di Mendrisio is Thomas Pallesen.
Alan Bean is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1932-03-15. , was a Test pilot. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , served as a crew member of Apollo 12. , is Retired. UT Austin, B.S. 1955 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Alan Shepard was born on the 15th of March 1923. , was a Test pilot. Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire. , was chosen by NASA in 1959. , is Deceased. NWC, M.A. 1957 is , Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in California.
Alan Bean is an the United. , was a Test pilot. Alan Bean was born in Wheeler. , served as a crew member of Apollo 12. , was operated by NASA. ,'s backup pilot was Alfred Worden. , was commanded by David Scott.
Buzz Aldrin was born on the 15th of March 20,1930. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater. Edwin E. Aldrin, Jr., Jr. was commonly known as ,.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1930-01-20. , spent 52.0(minutes) in space. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , was a Fighter pilot. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1930-01-20. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , is Retired. The number of ,'s awards are 20. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. , was born on the 15th of March 1930-01-20. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was chosen by NASA in 1963. , was operated by NASA. , is Retired.
Buzz Aldrin is an the United. Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge. , served as a crew member of Apollo 11. , was operated by NASA. , is Retired. ,'s backup pilot was William Anders. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Sc.D. 1963 is , Johnson's almaMater.
William Anders is an the United. , retired on 1969-09-01 1981. , was born on the 15th of March 1933-10-17. , was a Fighter pilot. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. , is Retired.
William Anders is an the United. , retired on 1969-09-01 1981. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. , was operated by NASA. ,'s backup pilot was Buzz Aldrin. Frank Borman was a member of the crew on ,.
William Anders retired on 1969 1981. , was born on the 15th of March 1933-10-17. , spent 8820.0(minutes) in space. , was a Fighter pilot. William Anders was born in British Hong. , served as a crew member of Apollo 8. , was chosen by NASA in 1963.
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart.
One of the noted Aaron S. Daggett Air Force battles was the Battle of Mine Run Grenada.
Ab Klink was born in Stellendam, Netherlands.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Tuanku Bujang Tuanku Othman
The leader party at Abdul Taib Mahmud is the Parti Bumiputera Sarawak Party (Spain).
Abdul Taib Mahmud  successor  Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib
Abdulsalami Abubakar  activeYearsEndDate  1999-05-29
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State.
Abner W. Sibal  activeYearsEndDate  1965-01-03
Abner W. Sibal Powys died in Alexandria, Virginia.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent.
Adam Holloway Gravesend resides in the United States.
University of Adelaide is Adenan Satem Johnson's almaMater.
Adolf Schärf was born in Mikulov.
Adonis Georgiadis  inOfficeWhilePrimeMinister  Antonis Samaras
Adonis Georgiadis  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Deputy Minister for Development, Competitiveness and Shipping
Agnes Kant was born in Hessisch Oldendorf.
Agnes Ward White was born in Marietta, Ohio.
Airey Neave  activeYearsStartDate  1953-06-30
Airey Neave won the Military Cross.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London.
Airey Neave  militaryRank  Lieutenant colonel
Airey Neave  serviceStartYear  1935
The leader party at Albert B. White is the Republican Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Albert B. White  spouse  Agnes Ward White
Albert Jennings Fountain  militaryBranch  Union Army
Alberto Teisaire is an Argentina.
Alberto Teisaire is located in the region Rear Admiral in the Argentine Navy.
Alfons Gorbach Powys died in Austria.
Alfred Moore Scales  activeYearsStartDate  1875-03-04
One of the noted Alfred Moore Scales Air Force battles was the Battle of Chancellorsville Grenada.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut.
Alfred N. Phillips  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Mayor of Stamford, Connecticut
Allan Shivers  activeYearsStartDate  1947-01-21
Allan Shivers  militaryBranch  United States Army
Allan Shivers  successor  Price Daniel
Alvah Sabin  activeYearsStartDate  1853-03-04
The leader party at Alvah Sabin is the Whig Party (United States) Party (Spain).
American Civil War was commanded by Robert E. Lee.
The Austrian German language is spoken in Austria.
Battle of Antietam was commanded by Robert E. Lee.
Battle of Cold Harbor  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
The leader of Buenos Aires is Gabriela Michetti.
Gulf War was commanded by Colin Powell.
John F. Kennedy  predecessor  Dwight D. Eisenhower
University of Vienna is Josef Klaus Johnson's almaMater.
Juan Carlos I of Spain  predecessor  Francisco Franco
The leader party at Juan Perón is the Labour Party (Argentina) Party (Spain).
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte.
One of the noted United States Army Air Force battles was the Spanish–American War Grenada.
William M. O. Dawson was born in Bloomington, Maryland.
The comic character 1955 Dodge is also known as Dodge Coronet.
1955 Dodge is located in the region 230 (cubic inches).
A-Rosa Luna  christeningDate  2005-04-07
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock.
AIDAluna was operated by AIDA Cruises.
AIDAstella  christeningDate  2013-03-16
AIDAstella was completed in 2013-03-11.
AIDAstella  maidenVoyage  2013-03-17
AIDAstella was operated by AIDA Cruises.
Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport is the architect of ALV X-1.
The comic character AMC Matador is also known as American Motors Matador.
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is Sold to the Netherlands 1 April 1948.
Abarth 1000 GT Coupé is located in the region Straight-four engine.
Acura TLX is located in the region Honda K engine.
Acura TLX  layout  AWD (vehicle)
Acura TLX  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Honda Accord
Acura TLX  transmission  9-speed ZF 9HP automatic (V6)
Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Arese
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Lancia Thema
Alfa Romeo 164  transmission  4-speed automatic (ZF 4HP18QE)
The Alhambra is a Samuda Brothers events venue type building.
Alhambra  shipBeam  8.3 m
Alhambra is Wrecked.
Alhambra  topSpeed  18.52
Alvis Speed 25 is located in the region Straight-six engine.
Alvis Speed 25  modelStartYear  1937
American submarine NR-1  shipDraft  4.6 m
Antares (rocket)  finalFlight  2014-10-28
Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of Antares (rocket).
The leader of Argentina is Gabriela Michetti.
Guiana Space Centre is the architect of Ariane 5.
Ariane 5  maidenFlight  2005-08-11
Aston Martin V8  bodyStyle  Convertible
Aston Martin V8  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Aston Martin Virage  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Atlas II  finalFlight  1998-03-16
Vandenberg Air Force Base is the architect of Atlas II.
Audi was founded by August Horch Reith 1st Baron Reith.
Audi A1  assembly  Audi Brussels
Audi A1  relatedMeanOfTransportation  SEAT Ibiza
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois.
Costa Crociere is located in Genoa.
De Soto Custom  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Chrysler Newport
Fiat Croma  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Alfa Romeo 164
Germany demonym is Germans.
The leader of Germany is Norbert Lammert.
The leader of Germany is Stanislaw Tillich.
Gruppo Bertone was founded by Giovanni Bertone Reith 1st Baron Reith.
The headquarters of Guiana Space Centre Airlines are located in Kourou, French Guiana.
Honda K engine  manufacturer  Honda
The anthem of United States is called The Star-Spangled Banner te romane.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Silvio Berlusconi is chairman of A.C. Milan Efxeinoupolis.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada.
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen.
Abel Hernández plays for Uruguay Olympic football team.
Abel Hernández plays for Uruguay national football team.
Abner (footballer) was born in Brazil.
Adam Maher was born in Diemen.
Adam Maher was born in Netherlands.
Adam Maher plays for Netherlands national under-17 football team.
Adam Maher plays for PSV Eindhoven.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Iraq national football team.
Akeem Adams was born in Point Fortin.
320 Akeem Dent Building was formerly called the Atlanta Falcons Bank Building.
Akeem Priestley plays for Connecticut Huskies.
Al-Khor Sports Club play in Qatar Stars League A.
The manager of Al-Zawra'a SC is Basim Qasim.
Al Kharaitiyat SC is located in Qatar Stars League.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra was born in Baghdad.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Sanat Mes Kerman F.C..
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Hamilton Academical F.C..
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Scotland national under-19 football team.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born on the 15th of March 1995-09-02.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. plays for Florida Panthers.
The 320 Aleksander Barkov, Jr. Building 1.905.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. play in National Hockey League A.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on the 15th of March 1989-02-24.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Amkar Perm.
Aleksandre Guruli was born in Batumi.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for Georgia national under-21 football team.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.S. Roma.
Alessio Romagnoli played youth football for A.S. Roma.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba.
Alex Tyus play in Turkish Basketball Super League A.
Atlanta Falcons is in the city of Atlanta, New York.
Don Sweeney is Boston Bruins Johnson's almaMater.
Budapest is located in Hungary.
The English language language is spoken in Canada.
The Slavey language language is spoken in Canada.
Columbus Blue Jackets is in the city of Columbus, Ohio, New York.
The manager of FC Karpaty Lviv is Oleh Luzhny.
The manager of FC Torpedo Moscow is Valery Petrakov.
Gábor Kubatov is chairman of Ferencvárosi TC Efxeinoupolis.
The Finnish language language is spoken in Finland.
Italy national under-16 football team  coach  Daniele Zoratto
Maccabi Ashdod B.C.  coach  Zvi Sherf
Motherwell F.C.'s ground is in Fir Park.
Olympique Lyonnais Regional Airport owner Jean-Michel Aulas, Michigan.
St. Louis Rams is in the city of St. Louis, New York.
Tennessee Titans is in the city of Nashville, Tennessee, New York.
Aaron Bertram  activeYearsStartYear  1998
Aaron Deer  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  The Horns of Happiness
The area code of Aaron Deer, Indiana is Kill Rock Stars.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Avant-garde metal.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Progressive metal.
Abradab  background  solo singer
Abradab was born on the 15th of March 1978-11-12.
Abradab was born in Poland.
Abradab the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music.
Agustín Barboza the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Guarania (music).
Ahmet Ertegun was born in Istanbul, Turkey.
Alan Frew the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music.
Albennie Jones  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Sammy Price
Aleksandra Kovač  background  solo singer
Aleksandra Kovač was born in Yugoslavia.
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues.
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Soul music.
Alex Day the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Synthpop.
Alfredo Zitarrosa  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Héctor Numa Moraes
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Montevideo.
Alfredo Zitarrosa Powys died in Uruguay.
The area code of Alfredo Zitarrosa, Indiana is RCA Records.
Alison O'Donnell  activeYearsStartYear  1963
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz.
Alison O'Donnell  instrument  Voice, bodhrán, percussion, autoharp
Allen Forrest was born on the 15th of March 1981-02-04.
Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music.
Alligator Records is located in Chicago.
Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Johnny Sansone
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues.
The area code of Anders Osborne, Indiana is Alligator Records.
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues.
Andrew Rayel  activeYearsStartYear  2009
Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns
Andrew Rayel was born in Chișinău, Moldova.
Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow
The area code of Andrew White (musician), Indiana is B-Unique Records.
Asunción is part of Gran Asunción.
Christian Burns  instrument  Guitar
Hip hop music  musicSubgenre  Gangsta rap
Hip hop music  stylisticOrigin  Funk
Indie rock  stylisticOrigin  New wave music
Manchester is part of Greater Manchester.
Polydor Records is located in London.
Sony Music Entertainment Studios Motion Pictures is the distributor of the film , RCA Records 6.
Rock and roll  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Synthpop  stylisticOrigin  Pop music
United kingdom demonym is British people.
(19255) 1994 VK8  density  2.0 (gram Per Cubic Centimetres)
(29075) 1950 DA  discoverer  Carl A. Wirtanen
(410777) 2009 FD  absoluteMagnitude  22.1
(410777) 2009 FD  apoapsis  259776702.47055 (kilometres)
(66063) 1998 RO1  apoapsis  254989570.60815 (kilometres)
(66063) 1998 RO1  epoch  2013-11-04
1000 Piazzia  escapeVelocity  0.0252 (kilometre Per Seconds)
320 1001 Gaussia Building was formerly called the 1923 OAA907 XC Bank Building.
1001 Gaussia  maximumTemperature  165.0 (kelvins)
101 Helena  apoapsis  441092000.0 (kilometres)
101 Helena  epoch  2006-12-31
101 Helena class is 3.0 (kilograms).
1036 Ganymed  averageSpeed  16.86 (kilometre Per Seconds)
103 Hera  absoluteMagnitude  7.66
103 Hera class is 7.9 (kilograms).
107 Camilla  absoluteMagnitude  7.08
107 Camilla  discoverer  A. Storrs
320 1089 Tama Building was formerly called the A894 VA; A904 VD; Bank Building.
1089 Tama  orbitalPeriod  1202.846 (days)
1097 Vicia  averageSpeed  17.92 (kilometre Per Seconds)
1097 Vicia  epoch  2006-12-31
1097 Vicia  rotationPeriod  95040.0
109 Felicitas  discoverer  Christian Heinrich Friedrich Peters
109 Felicitas  periapsis  283326000000.0
10 Hygiea  averageSpeed  16.76 (kilometre Per Seconds)
1101 Clematis  periapsis  445895000000.0
110 Lydia  epoch  2006-12-31
11264 Claudiomaccone  temperature  173.0 (kelvins)
University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater.
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham.
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. One of the noted Aaron S. Daggett Air Force battles was the Battle of Fredericksburg Grenada.
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. One of the noted Aaron S. Daggett Air Force battles was the Battle of Gettysburg Grenada.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub  hasDeputy  Stephen Yong Kuet Tze Abdul Taib Mahmud  successor  Abdul Rahman Ya'kub
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Kingdom of Sarawak. The leader party at Abdul Taib Mahmud is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna. Technical Institute, Kaduna is Abdulsalami Abubakar Johnson's almaMater.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State. Abdulsalami Abubakar  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Chief of the Defence Staff (Nigeria)
Abdulsalami Abubakar  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Chief of the Defence Staff (Nigeria) Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Al-Amin Daggash
Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Olusegun Obasanjo Abdulsalami Abubakar  activeYearsEndDate  1999-05-29
Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Olusegun Obasanjo Abdulsalami Abubakar  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Mike Akhigbe
One of the noted Abner W. Sibal Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Joseph Stalin.
One of the noted United States Army Air Force battles was the Korean War Grenada. Abner W. Sibal  militaryBranch  United States Army
Adam Holloway was born in Kent. Magdalene College, Cambridge is Adam Holloway Johnson's almaMater.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent. Adam Holloway Gravesend resides in the United States.
Adam Koc won the Virtuti Militari. One of the noted Adam Koc Air Force battles was the World War I Grenada.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. Adonis Georgiadis  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. Adonis Georgiadis  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally
Agnes Kant was born in Hessisch Oldendorf. Agnes Kant  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Parliamentary group leader
Airey Neave won the Military Cross. Airey Neave  unit  Royal Artillery
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the Battle of France Grenada. Airey Neave  activeYearsStartDate  1974-03-04
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the Battle of France Grenada. Battle of France was commanded by Hugo Sperrle.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge. One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada.
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Franklin D. Roosevelt.
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Joseph Stalin.
Albert B. White was born on the 15th of March 1856-09-22. Albert B. White  deathYear  1941
Albert B. White was born on the 15th of March 1856-09-22. Albert B. White is located in the region Politician.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City. Albert Jennings Fountain Powys died in Doña Ana County, New Mexico.
Albert Jennings Fountain Powys died in New Mexico Territory. Albert Jennings Fountain  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Edmund J. Davis
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City. The leader party at Albert Jennings Fountain is the Republican Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Alberto Teisaire  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Provisional President of the Argentine Senate Alberto Teisaire  successor  Isaac Rojas
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria. Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria-Hungary.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol (state). Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria.
Alfred Moore Scales  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of North Carolina Alfred Moore Scales  successor  James W. Reid (politician)
Princeton University is Daniel Gould Fowle Johnson's almaMater. Alfred Moore Scales  successor  Daniel Gould Fowle
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut. Alfred N. Phillips  office (workedAt, workedAs)  United States House of Representatives
One of the noted United States Army Air Force battles was the American Civil War Grenada. Alfred N. Phillips  militaryBranch  United States Army
One of the noted Allan Shivers Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Joseph Stalin.
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. Allan Shivers  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port Arthur)
Allan Shivers  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port Arthur) Allan Shivers  successor  Ben Ramsey
Alvah Sabin was born on the 15th of March 1793-10-23. Alvah Sabin  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Secretary of State of Vermont
Agnes Kant is located in Netherlands. The currency in Netherlands is Euro.
Agnes Kant is located in Netherlands. The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte.
Parkersburg, West Virginia is located in United States. Albert B. White Powys died in Parkersburg, West Virginia.
Aaron Boogaard plays for Wichita Thunder. Aaron Boogaard was born in Saskatchewan.
Abel Hernández plays for Peñarol. The manager of Peñarol is Jorge Orosmán da Silva.
Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. Abel Hernández plays for Peñarol.
Adam Maher plays for Netherlands national under-17 football team. Adam Maher plays for AZ Alkmaar.
Adam Maher plays for PSV Eindhoven. Adam Maher plays for Netherlands national under-17 football team.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Steel Azin F.C.. Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Al Shorta SC.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvárosi TC. The manager of Ferencvárosi TC is Thomas Doll.
Akeem Adams plays for Trinidad and Tobago national football team. Akeem Adams plays for T&TEC Sports Club.
320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the New England Patriots Bank Building. Akeem Ayers  draftPick  39
320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the Tennessee Titans Bank Building. Akeem Ayers  draftPick  39
Akeem Dent was born on the 15th of March 1987-09-27. Akeem Dent was born in 1987.
Akeem Priestley plays for Connecticut Huskies. Akeem Priestley plays for Sheikh Russel KC.
Akeem Priestley plays for Ro PS. Akeem Priestley plays for Sheikh Russel KC.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al-Khor Sports Club. Al-Khor Sports Club's ground is in Al Khor.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al Kharaitiyat SC. The manager of Al Kharaitiyat SC is Amar Osim.
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Hamilton Academical F.C.. Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Leeds United F.C..
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Hamilton Academical F.C.. Hamilton Academical F.C.'s ground is in New Douglas Park.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. plays for Florida Panthers. Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born on the 15th of March 1995-09-02.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. plays for Florida Panthers. Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow. The manager of FC Torpedo Moscow is Valery Petrakov.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk. FC Tom Tomsk play in Russian Football National League A.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv. Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba. Alex Plante was born in 1989.
Alex Tyus plays for Pallacanestro Cantù. Alex Tyus was born on the 15th of March 1988-01-08.
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Tel Aviv B.C.. Alex Tyus play in Turkish Basketball Super League A.
The leader of Brandon, Manitoba is Conservative Party of Canada. Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba.
Adam Mc Quaid was born in Canada. The anthem of Canada is called O Canada te romane.
The English language language is spoken in Canada. Adam Mc Quaid was born in Canada.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi. The manager of FC Dinamo Batumi is Levan Khomeriki.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. FC Spartak Moscow's ground is in Otkrytiye Arena.
Akeem Priestley plays for Ro PS. Ro PS play in Veikkausliiga A.
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C.. United Petrotrin F.C.'s ground is in Palo Seco Velodrome.
Aaron Deer the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Psychedelia. Aaron Deer  instrument  Guitar
Aaron Deer is located in the region United States. Aaron Deer is located in the region Indiana.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Electroacoustic music. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band)
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Avant-garde metal. Aaron Turner  instrument  Singing
Abradab  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Magik (rapper) Abradab  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaliber 44
Abradab was born on the 15th of March 1978-11-12. Abradab was born in Katowice.
Abradab was born in Katowice. Abradab was born in Poland.
Ace Wilder the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Hip hop music  stylisticOrigin  Disco
The area code of Ace Wilder, Indiana is Warner Music Group. Ace Wilder  background  solo singer
Agustín Barboza was born in Paraguay. The area code of Agustín Barboza, Indiana is Philips Records.
Alan Frew the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Rock music  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music)
Alan Frew the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Rock music  stylisticOrigin  Country music
Albennie Jones the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. Aleksandra Kovač  background  solo singer
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Rhythm and blues  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Soul music. Aleksandra Kovač  activeYearsStartYear  1990
Alex Day the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Synthpop. Synthpop  stylisticOrigin  New wave music
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England. Alfred Garth Jones was born in 1872.
Alfredo Zitarrosa the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Milonga (music). Alfredo Zitarrosa  background  solo singer
Alfredo Zitarrosa the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Taquirari. Alfredo Zitarrosa  background  solo singer
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay. Alfredo Zitarrosa Powys died in Montevideo.
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Montevideo. Alfredo Zitarrosa Powys died in Uruguay.
Alfredo Zitarrosa the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Zamba (artform). Alfredo Zitarrosa  background  solo singer
Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Plastik Mak Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bajik
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk rock. The area code of Alison O'Donnell, Indiana is Floating World Records.
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Alison O'Donnell  instrument  Voice, bodhrán, percussion, autoharp
Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Allen Forrest  background  solo singer
Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. Alternative rock  musicSubgenre  Christian alternative rock
Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Phil Lesh and Friends Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Tab Benoit
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. The area code of Anders Osborne, Indiana is Rabadash Records.
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. The area code of Anders Osborne, Indiana is Shanachie Records.
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. Andra (singer)  activeYearsStartYear  2000
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Rhythm and blues  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jonathan Mendelsohn
Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jonathan Mendelsohn Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mark Sixma
Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jwaydan Moyine Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Armin van Buuren
Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. Alternative rock  stylisticOrigin  New wave music
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Country music. Country music  instrument  Banjo
Polydor Records is located in London. The area code of Andrew White (musician), Indiana is Polydor Records.
(19255) 1994 VK8  escapeVelocity  0.0925 (kilometre Per Seconds) (19255) 1994 VK8  apoapsis  6603633000.0 (kilometres)
(410777) 2009 FD  apoapsis  259776702.47055 (kilometres) (410777) 2009 FD  minimumTemperature  211.0 (kelvins)
(410777) 2009 FD  periapsis  88234300000.0 (410777) 2009 FD  discoverer  Spacewatch
(66063) 1998 RO1  epoch  2013-11-04 (66063) 1998 RO1  escapeVelocity  0.0999 (kilometre Per Seconds)
(66391) 1999 KW4  epoch  2004-07-14 (66391) 1999 KW4  orbitalPeriod  16244700.0
(66391) 1999 KW4  epoch  2004-07-14 (66391) 1999 KW4  rotationPeriod  9953.28
101 Helena  discoverer  James Craig Watson James Craig Watson  deathCause  Peritonitis
1036 Ganymed  averageSpeed  16.86 (kilometre Per Seconds) 1036 Ganymed  apoapsis  611961000.0 (kilometres)
Walter Baade was born in German Empire. 1036 Ganymed  discoverer  Walter Baade
Walter Baade is an Germany. 1036 Ganymed  discoverer  Walter Baade
103 Hera  discoverer  James Craig Watson James Craig Watson  deathCause  Peritonitis
James Craig Watson is an Canada. 103 Hera  discoverer  James Craig Watson
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham. 107 Camilla  discoverer  N. R. Pogson
320 1089 Tama Building was formerly called the A919 HA; 1927 WB; Bank Building. 1089 Tama  epoch  2005-11-26
1089 Tama  temperature  179.0 (kelvins) 1089 Tama  apoapsis  373513000.0 (kilometres)
1097 Vicia  epoch  2006-12-31 1097 Vicia  periapsis  279142000000.0
109 Felicitas  apoapsis  523329000.0 (kilometres) 109 Felicitas  temperature  170.0 (kelvins)
109 Felicitas  epoch  2006-12-31 109 Felicitas  periapsis  283326000000.0
109 Felicitas  rotationPeriod  47487.6 109 Felicitas  epoch  2006-12-31
10 Hygiea  apoapsis  523951582.33968 (kilometres) 10 Hygiea  temperature  164.0 (kelvins)
320 10 Hygiea Building was formerly called the A900 GA Bank Building. 10 Hygiea  epoch  2015-06-27
110 Lydia  epoch  2006-12-31 110 Lydia class is 6.7 (kilograms).
110 Lydia  epoch  2006-12-31 110 Lydia  orbitalPeriod  142603000.0
A-Rosa Luna class is Cruise ship. The runway length of A-Rosa Luna Airport is 125800.0 (millimetres).
A-Rosa Luna belongs to the order of 2004-01-22. The runway length of A-Rosa Luna Airport is 125800.0 (millimetres).
AIDA Cruises is located in Germany. AIDAstella was operated by AIDA Cruises.
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock. AIDAluna was operated by AIDA Cruises.
AIDAluna  topSpeed  40.744 The runway length of AIDAluna Airport is 252000.0 (millimetres).
AIDAstella  christeningDate  2013-03-16 The runway length of AIDAstella Airport is 253260.0 (millimetres).
The ALCO RS-3 is a Montreal Locomotive Works events venue type building. ALCO RS-3 is governed by the Diesel-electric transmission and County Council.
ALV X-1  diameter  1.524 (metres) ALV X-1  rocketStages  2
AMC Matador  assembly  Kenosha, Wisconsin AMC Matador  modelYears  1974
AMC Matador Martyrs Memorial designer was Richard A. Teague Bütüner and Hilmi Güner. Richard A. Teague  employer  Chrysler
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is located in Argentina. The runway length of ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) Airport is 192000.0 (millimetres).
Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Milan Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Saab 9000
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Lancia Thema Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy
Alvis Car and Engineering Company is located in Coventry. Alvis Speed 25  manufacturer  Alvis Car and Engineering Company
Alvis Speed 25  transmission  single plate clutch, separate 4-speed gearbox all-silent and all-syncromesh, centre change lever, open tubular propellor shaft with metal joints , spiral bevel fully floating back axle Alvis Speed 25 is located in the region 4387.0 (cubic Centimetres).
Alvis Speed 25  transmission  single plate clutch, separate 4-speed gearbox all-silent and all-syncromesh, centre change lever, open tubular propellor shaft with metal joints , spiral bevel fully floating back axle Alvis Speed 25 is located in the region Straight-six engine.
American Motors  successor  Eagle (automobile) AMC Matador  manufacturer  American Motors
Antares (rocket)  maidenFlight  2014-01-09 Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport is the architect of Antares (rocket).
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is located in Argentina. The leader of Argentina is Gabriela Michetti.
ELA-3 is the architect of Ariane 5. Ariane 5  manufacturer  Airbus Defence and Space
Airbus Defence and Space University is the parent company of the Airbus Group University Press. Ariane 5  manufacturer  Airbus Defence and Space
Aston Martin V8  assembly  United Kingdom Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin RHAM/1
Aston Martin V8  manufacturer  Aston Martin Aston Martin V8  successor  Aston Martin Virage
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8  successor  Aston Martin Virage
Aston Martin V8  successor  Aston Martin Virage Aston Martin Virage  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Atlas II  finalFlight  1998-03-16 Atlas II  diameter  3.04 m
Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of Atlas II. Atlas II  manufacturer  Lockheed Martin
Audi belongs to the division of Audi e-tron. Audi A1  manufacturer  Audi
Audi A1  manufacturer  Audi Audi  subsidiary  Ducati
Audi A1  manufacturer  Audi Audi  subsidiary  Quattro Gmb H
Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person for Caterpillar Inc.. AIDAluna is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Vandenberg Air Force Base is the architect of Delta II. Antares (rocket)  comparable  Delta II
The leader of Finland is Juha Sipilä. The Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker) is a Finland events venue type building.
General Dynamics Electric Boat University is the parent company of the General Dynamics University Press. The American submarine NR-1 is a General Dynamics Electric Boat events venue type building.
MTU Friedrichshafen Regional Airport owner Rolls-Royce Holdings, Michigan. A-Rosa Luna is governed by the MTU Friedrichshafen and County Council.
The leader of United kingdom is Elizabeth II. Aston Martin V8  assembly  United Kingdom
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Battle of Fredericksburg Grenada.
Ab Klink was born in Netherlands. Erasmus University Rotterdam is Ab Klink Johnson's almaMater. The leader party at , is the Christian Democratic Appeal Party (Spain).
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Kingdom of Sarawak. Abdul Rahman Ya'kub  hasDeputy  Stephen Yong Kuet Tze ,  successor  Abdul Rahman Ya'kub
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Kingdom of Sarawak. Abdul Taib Mahmud Sarawak resides in the United States. The leader party at , is the Barisan Ra'ayat Jati Sarawak Party (Spain).
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State. Technical Institute, Kaduna is Abdulsalami Abubakar Johnson's almaMater. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Chief of the Defence Staff (Nigeria)
Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Olusegun Obasanjo Abdulsalami Abubakar  militaryBranch  Nigerian Air Force ,  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Atiku Abubakar
Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Olusegun Obasanjo Abdulsalami Abubakar  militaryBranch  Nigerian Army ,  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Atiku Abubakar
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas. Abel Caballero was born in Galicia (Spain). ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Congress of Deputies
Abel Caballero was born in Spain. Abel Caballero was born in Galicia (Spain). The leader party at , is the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party Party (Spain).
One of the noted Abner W. Sibal Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Joseph Stalin. ,  militaryBranch  United States Army
Abner W. Sibal was born in Ridgewood, Queens. Abner W. Sibal  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Connecticut Senate from the 26th District The leader party at , is the Republican Party (United States) Party (Spain).
One of the noted Adam Holloway Air Force battles was the Gulf War Grenada. Gulf War was commanded by George H. W. Bush. ,  militaryBranch  Grenadier Guards
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham. Magdalene College, Cambridge is Adam Holloway Johnson's almaMater. The leader party at , is the Conservative Party (UK) Party (Spain).
Adam Koc was born in Congress Poland. One of the noted Adam Koc Air Force battles was the Polish–Soviet War Grenada. , was commanded by Leon Trotsky.
One of the noted Adam Koc Air Force battles was the Polish–Soviet War Grenada. Polish–Soviet War was commanded by Leon Trotsky. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  Russian Civil War
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Minister for Health
Adonis Georgiadis  inOfficeWhilePrimeMinister  Antonis Samaras New Democracy (Greece) is located in Blue. The leader party at , is the New Democracy (Greece) Party (Spain).
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. Agnes Kant is an Netherlands. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  House of Representatives (Netherlands)
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. Agnes Kant is an Netherlands. The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
Agnes Kant was born in West Germany. Radboud University Nijmegen is Agnes Kant Johnson's almaMater. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the House of Representatives
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. Airey Neave  activeYearsStartDate  1953-06-30 ,  activeYearsEndDate  1979-03-30
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. Airey Neave  activeYearsStartDate  1974-03-04 ,  activeYearsEndDate  1979-03-30
Albert B. White was born on the 15th of March 1856-09-22. Albert B. White  deathYear  1941 The architect , died in 1941-07-03, Texas.
Agnes Ward White was born in Marietta, Ohio. Albert B. White  spouse  Agnes Ward White ,  successor  William M. O. Dawson
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island. , Powys died in United States.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City. Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island. , Powys died in New Mexico Territory.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York. Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island. , Powys died in United States.
The leader of Buenos Aires is Horacio Rodríguez Larreta. Buenos Aires's governing body is Buenos Aires City Legislature City Council. , Powys died in Buenos Aires.
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina. Alberto Teisaire is located in the region Rear admiral. ,  successor  Isaac Rojas
Alfons Gorbach was born in County of Tyrol. Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria. , Powys died in Graz.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut. Alfred N. Phillips  successor  Albert E. Austin ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Connecticut's 4th district
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut. Alfred N. Phillips  successor  Albert E. Austin ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Connecticut's 4th district
Allan Shivers  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port Arthur) The leader party at Allan Shivers is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Wilfred R. Cousins, Jr.
Burlington, Vermont is the largest city in Vermont, Texas. Alvah Sabin is located in the region Vermont. ,  activeYearsEndDate  1857-03-03
The leader of Whig Party (United States) is Henry Clay. Alvah Sabin was born on the 15th of March 1793-10-23. The leader party at , is the Whig Party (United States) Party (Spain).
The leader of Whig Party (United States) is Daniel Webster. Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont. The leader party at , is the Whig Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in United States. One of the noted Albert Jennings Fountain Air Force battles was the American Civil War Grenada. , was commanded by Abraham Lincoln.
One of the noted Alfred Moore Scales Air Force battles was the Battle of Fredericksburg Grenada. American Civil War was commanded by Jefferson Davis. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
The leader of Austria is Doris Bures. Alfons Gorbach was born in County of Tyrol. , Powys died in Austria.
The leader of Austria is Doris Bures. Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol (state). , Powys died in Austria.
The leader of Austria is Doris Bures. Alfons Gorbach Powys died in Styria. , Powys died in Austria.
One of the noted Aaron S. Daggett Air Force battles was the Battle of Salem Church Grenada. Battle of Salem Church was commanded by Robert E. Lee. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
Ab Klink is an Netherlands. Ab Klink was born in Stellendam. The currency in , is Euro.
The Polish language language is spoken in Poland. , is an Poland. Kashubians are an ethnic group in the Poland.
(19255) 1994 VK8  escapeVelocity  0.0925 (kilometre Per Seconds) (19255) 1994 VK8 class is 5.6 (kilograms). ,  apoapsis  6603633000.0 (kilometres)
(410777) 2009 FD  orbitalPeriod  39447000.0 (410777) 2009 FD  periapsis  88234300000.0 ,  discoverer  Spacewatch
(66063) 1998 RO1  minimumTemperature  -71.0 (degree Celsius) (66063) 1998 RO1  maximumTemperature  500.0 (kelvins) ,  apoapsis  254989570.60815 (kilometres)
(66391) 1999 KW4  averageSpeed  37.16 (kilometre Per Seconds) (66391) 1999 KW4  density  2.0 (gram Per Cubic Centimetres) ,  apoapsis  162164091.8388 (kilometres)
1000 Piazzia  orbitalPeriod  488160.0 1000 Piazzia  periapsis  352497000000.0 ,  epoch  2015-06-27
320 1001 Gaussia Building was formerly called the 1923 OAA907 XC Bank Building. 1001 Gaussia  epoch  2015-06-27 ,  periapsis  419113394.55312 (kilometres)
101 Helena class is 3.0 (kilograms). 101 Helena  escapeVelocity  0.0348 (kilometre Per Seconds) ,  apoapsis  441092000.0 (kilometres)
Walter Baade is an Germany. University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade
James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. 103 Hera  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  epoch  2011-08-27
James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. 103 Hera  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  deathCause  Peritonitis
103 Hera  epoch  2011-08-27 103 Hera  orbitalPeriod  1622.213 (days) ,  apoapsis  437170000.0 (kilometres)
103 Hera  escapeVelocity  0.0482 (kilometre Per Seconds) 103 Hera  temperature  170.0 (kelvins) ,  apoapsis  437170000.0 (kilometres)
N. R. Pogson is an England. N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham. ,  discoverer  N. R. Pogson
320 1089 Tama Building was formerly called the A894 VA; A904 VD; Bank Building. 1089 Tama  epoch  2005-11-26 ,  orbitalPeriod  1202.846 (days)
1089 Tama  epoch  2005-11-26 1089 Tama  periapsis  288749000000.0 ,  apoapsis  373513000.0 (kilometres)
320 1097 Vicia Building was formerly called the 1928 PC Bank Building. 1097 Vicia  epoch  2006-12-31 ,  periapsis  279142000000.0
109 Felicitas  epoch  2006-12-31 109 Felicitas class is 7.5 (kilograms). ,  orbitalPeriod  139705000.0
109 Felicitas  epoch  2006-12-31 109 Felicitas  orbitalPeriod  139705000.0 ,  apoapsis  523329000.0 (kilometres)
10 Hygiea  averageSpeed  16.76 (kilometre Per Seconds) 10 Hygiea  orbitalPeriod  5.57 (days) ,  apoapsis  523951582.33968 (kilometres)
10 Hygiea  averageSpeed  16.76 (kilometre Per Seconds) 10 Hygiea  surfaceArea  837080.744 (square Kilometres) ,  apoapsis  523951582.33968 (kilometres)
10 Hygiea  surfaceArea  837080.744 (square Kilometres) 10 Hygiea  apoapsis  523951582.33968 (kilometres) ,  temperature  164.0 (kelvins)
110 Lydia  epoch  2006-12-31 110 Lydia class is 6.7 (kilograms). ,  periapsis  377016000000.0
110 Lydia  epoch  2006-12-31 110 Lydia  periapsis  377016000000.0 ,  apoapsis  440756000.0 (kilometres)
Suburban Legends the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. Aaron Bertram  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kids Imagine Nation ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Suburban Legends
Aaron Deer the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Indie rock. Aaron Deer is located in the region Indiana. , is located in the region United States.
Aaron Deer the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Psychedelia. Aaron Deer is located in the region United States. , is located in the region Indiana.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Greymachine
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Drone music. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Greymachine
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Ambient music. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mamiffer
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  instrument  Electric guitar ,  musicFusionGenre  Death metal
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  instrument  Singing ,  musicFusionGenre  Death metal
Abradab was born on the 15th of March 1978-11-12. Abradab  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Magik (rapper) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaliber 44
Abradab  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Magik (rapper) Abradab  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaliber 44 , is located in the region Katowice.
Ace Wilder the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Hip hop music  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  stylisticOrigin  Disco
The leader of Paraguay is Juan Afara. Agustín Barboza was born in Asunción. , was born in Paraguay.
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Al Anderson (NRBQ band)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  NRBQ ,  instrument  Singing
Alan Frew the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Rock music  stylisticOrigin  Country music ,  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music)
Albennie Jones the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  stylisticOrigin  Blues ,  musicFusionGenre  Afrobeat
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi. Albennie Jones the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. ,  derivative  Disco
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. Aleksandra Kovač  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bebi Dol ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  K2 (Kovač sisters duo)
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. Aleksandra Kovač  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bebi Dol ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kornelije Kovač
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Aleksandra Kovač  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  K2 (Kovač sisters duo) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kristina Kovač
Alex Day the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Synthpop. Synthpop  stylisticOrigin  Pop music ,  stylisticOrigin  Disco
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England. Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester. , Powys died in Sidcup.
Alfred Garth Jones is an United Kingdom. Alfred Garth Jones was born in England. , Powys died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones is an United Kingdom. Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester. , Powys died in London.
The leader of Manchester is Labour Party (UK). Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester. , Powys died in Sidcup.
The leader of London is Boris Johnson. Alfred Garth Jones Powys died in Sidcup. , Powys died in London.
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk music of Ireland. Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Flibbertigibbet ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mellow Candle
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk music. Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mellow Candle ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Flibbertigibbet
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  derivative  Funk ,  instrument  Voice, bodhrán, percussion, autoharp
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  derivative  Funk The area code of ,, Indiana is Static Caravan Recordings.
Allen Forrest was born in Dothan, Alabama. Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. ,  background  solo singer
Allen Forrest was born in Dothan, Alabama. Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. ,  background  solo singer
Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. Alternative rock  musicFusionGenre  Nu metal ,  stylisticOrigin  New wave music
Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Billy Iuso Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Tab Benoit ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kirk Joseph
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. The area code of Anders Osborne, Indiana is Rabadash Records. ,  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music)
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Dance-pop. Andra (singer)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Puya (singer) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  CRBL
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Andra (singer)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Andreea Bălan ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marius Moga
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Andra (singer)  background  solo singer ,  derivative  Disco
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jonathan Mendelsohn
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jonathan Mendelsohn ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bobina
Christian Burns the Evil Librarians is in the genre of House music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jwaydan Moyine ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns
Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaiser Chiefs The area code of ,, Indiana is Universal Records (defunct record label).
Aaron Bertram the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Ska punk. Ska punk  stylisticOrigin  Ska ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Suburban Legends
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi. , was born in United States.
The comic character 1955 Dodge is also known as Dodge Coronet. 1955 Dodge is located in the region V8 engine. ,  transmission  3-speed automatic
A-Rosa Luna class is Cruise ship. The runway length of A-Rosa Luna Airport is 125800.0 (millimetres). , belongs to the order of 2004-01-22.
A-Rosa Luna  shipDisplacement  1850.0 (tonnes) A-Rosa Luna  topSpeed  24.0 The runway length of , Airport is 125800.0 (millimetres).
AIDA Cruises is located in Germany. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises.
AIDAstella  christeningDate  2013-03-16 AIDAstella  shipInService  2013-03-17 The runway length of , Airport is 253260.0 (millimetres).
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. ALCO RS-3 is located in the region Four-stroke engine. The runway length of , Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres).
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. ALCO RS-3 is located in the region V12 engine. The runway length of , Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres).
American Locomotive Company was founded in Schenectady, New York, D.C. The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. The runway length of , Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres).
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. United States demonym is American. , is located in United States.
Washington is the capital of United States. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , is located in United States.
ALV X-1  diameter  1.524 (metres) ALV X-1  rocketStages  2 ,  totalLaunches  1
Abarth 1000 GT Coupé  productionEndYear  1958 Abarth 1000 GT Coupé  bodyStyle  Coupé , is located in the region Straight-four engine.
Abarth 1000 GT Coupé 2160.0 (millimetres) a website. Abarth 1000 GT Coupé  width  1.55 ,  bodyStyle  Two door coupé
Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker)  shipBeam  21.2 The Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker) is a Helsinki events venue type building. The , is a Arctech Helsinki Shipyard events venue type building.
Rome is the capital of Italy. Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma
Rome is the capital of Italy. Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Lancia Thema
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Arese ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Lancia Thema
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Milan ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Saab 9000
Alhambra  shipBeam  8.3 m The runway length of Alhambra Airport is 63800.0 (millimetres). ,  shipLaunch  1855-05-31
Alhambra is Wrecked. Alhambra  shipBeam  8.3 m ,  shipLaunch  1855-05-31
Alvis Car and Engineering Company was founded in Coventry, D.C. Alvis Speed 25  manufacturer  Alvis Car and Engineering Company , is located in the region Petrol.
Roy D. Chapin, Jr. is the key person for American Motors. American Motors is in Eagle (automobile), Sri Lanka. ,  manufacturer  American Motors
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Antares (rocket)  comparable  Delta II , is located in United States.
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of Antares (rocket). , is located in Medium expendable launch system.
Ariane 5  manufacturer  Arianespace ELA-3 Guiana Space Centre a website. ELA-3 is the architect of ,.
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8  assembly  Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire, England, United Kingdom , is located in the region 5.3 (litres).
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8 is located in the region 5.3 (litres). ,  assembly  United Kingdom
Atlas II is located in United States. Vandenberg Air Force Base is the architect of Atlas II. Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of ,.
The United States, Pakistan, is led by President Assembly of the Punjab. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , is located in United States.
Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of Atlas II. Atlas II is located in United States. Spaceport Florida Launch Complex 36 is the architect of ,.
Audi A1 is located in the region 1.2 (litres). Audi A1  assembly  Audi Brussels ,  bodyStyle  Hatchback
Audi A1  manufacturer  Audi Audi A1  relatedMeanOfTransportation  SEAT Ibiza ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Volkswagen Polo
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois. Caterpillar Inc. was founded in California, D.C. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Illinois. AIDAluna Regional Airport owner AIDA Cruises, Michigan. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Costa Crociere is located in Genoa. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises.
Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex 2 is the architect of Delta II. Antares (rocket)  comparable  Delta II , is located in United States.
The headquarters of Guiana Space Centre Airlines are located in French Guiana. ELA-3 Guiana Space Centre a website. ELA-3 is the architect of ,.
Guiana Space Centre is located in Kourou, French Guiana. ELA-3 Guiana Space Centre a website. ELA-3 is the architect of ,.
Neptun Werft is located in Rostock. The A-Rosa Luna is a Neptun Werft events venue type building. , is located in Germany.
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. United States demonym is American. , is located in United States.
Aaron Hunt plays for Vf L Wolfsburg. Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen. , played youth football for Goslarer SC 08.
Aaron Hunt plays for Vf L Wolfsburg. Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II. The manager of , is Dieter Hecking.
Abel Hernández plays for Hull City A.F.C.. Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. , played youth football for Central Español.
Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. Abel Hernández plays for Peñarol. , played youth football for Central Español.
Adam Maher plays for PSV Eindhoven. Adam Maher plays for AZ Alkmaar. , was born in Netherlands.
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C.. Akeem Adams plays for W Connection F.C.. ,'s ground is in Palo Seco.
320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the Los Angeles Rams Bank Building. Akeem Ayers  draftRound  2 ,  draftPick  39
320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the St. Louis Rams Bank Building. Akeem Ayers  draftRound  2 ,  draftPick  39
Akeem Dent was born on the 15th of March 1987-09-27. Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia. ,  debutTeam  Atlanta Falcons
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club. Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Iraq national under-20 football team. , was born in Iraq.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al Kharaitiyat SC. Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club. ,'s ground is in Al Khor.
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Hamilton Academical F.C.. Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Clyde F.C.. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-01-01.
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Motherwell F.C.. Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Accrington Stanley F.C.. ,'s ground is in Accrington.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. plays for Florida Panthers. , was born on the 15th of March 1995-09-02. Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland.
Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born on the 15th of March 1995-09-02. Aleksander Barkov, Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland. ,  draftTeam  Florida Panthers
The leader of Russia is Vladimir Putin. Aleksandr Chumakov was born in Soviet Union. , Powys died in Russia.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Alania Vladikavkaz. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-02-24.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for Russia national football B team. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-02-24.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for Olympique Lyonnais. Aleksandre Guruli plays for AZAL PFK. ,'s ground is in Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for Olympique Lyonnais. Aleksandre Guruli plays for US Lesquin. ,'s ground is in Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.C. Milan. Alessio Romagnoli plays for Italy national under-16 football team. The manager of , is Siniša Mihajlović.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.C. Milan. Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria. The manager of , is Siniša Mihajlović.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for Italy national under-16 football team. Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.S. Roma. ,  coach  Daniele Zoratto
Alessio Romagnoli plays for Italy national under-17 football team. Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria. , was born in Italy.
Alex Plante plays for Anyang Halla. Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba. The 320 , Building 1.9304.
Alex Plante plays for Anyang Halla. Alex Plante was born in Canada. The 320 , Building 1.9304.
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Ashdod B.C.. Alex Tyus play in Euroleague A. ,  coach  Zvi Sherf
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Ashdod B.C.. Alex Tyus play in Turkish Basketball Super League A. ,  coach  Zvi Sherf
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. ,'s ground is in Otkrytiye Arena.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Anzhi Makhachkala. FC Spartak Moscow's ground is in Otkrytiye Arena. , played youth football for FC Spartak Moscow.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow. FC Torpedo Moscow played in the 2014–15 Russian Premier League season. The manager of , is Valery Petrakov.
Abel Hernández plays for Hull City A.F.C.. Abel Hernández plays for Uruguay Olympic football team. The manager of , is Steve Bruce.
The leader of Moscow is Sergey Sobyanin. Aleksandr Chumakov was born in Moscow. , Powys died in Russia.
Abner (footballer) plays for Brazil national under-20 football team. Abner (footballer) plays for Real Madrid Castilla. The manager of , is Luis Miguel Ramis.
Abner (footballer) plays for Real Madrid Castilla. Abner (footballer) plays for C.D. FAS. The manager of , is Luis Miguel Ramis.
St Louis is part of Greater St. Louis. The leader of St Louis is Francis. , was born in St. Louis.
Tennessee Titans is in the city of Nashville, Tennessee, New York. 320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the New England Patriots Bank Building. ,  debutTeam  Tennessee Titans
Akeem Adams plays for Trinidad and Tobago national under-20 football team. Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C.. ,'s ground is in Palo Seco.
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen. Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II. The manager of , is Alexander Nouri. , play in 3. Liga A.
Abel Hernández plays for Peñarol. Abel Hernández plays for Hull City A.F.C.. The manager of , is Steve Bruce. , played youth football for Central Español.
Abel Hernández plays for Central Español. Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. The manager of , is Jorge Orosmán da Silva. , played youth football for Peñarol.
Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. The manager of U.S. Città di Palermo is Giuseppe Iachini. , play in Serie A A. , played youth football for Peñarol.
Adam Mc Quaid was born on the 15th of March 1986-10-12. Adam Mc Quaid was born in Prince Edward Island. The 320 , Building 94.8024 (kilograms). , was born in 1986.
Adam Mc Quaid plays for Boston Bruins. Columbus Blue Jackets is in the city of Columbus, Ohio, New York. ,  draftTeam  Columbus Blue Jackets Don Sweeney is , Johnson's almaMater.
Akeem Ayers was born on the 15th of March 1989-07-10. 320 Akeem Ayers Building was formerly called the St. Louis Rams Bank Building. ,  debutTeam  Tennessee Titans , was born in 1989.
Akeem Dent was born on the 15th of March 1987-09-27. Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia. , was born in 1987. 320 , Building was formerly called the Houston Texans Bank Building.
Akeem Dent was born on the 15th of March 1987-09-27. Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia. ,  debutTeam  Atlanta Falcons 320 , Building was formerly called the Houston Texans Bank Building.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al-Zawra'a SC. Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al Kharaitiyat SC. ,'s ground is in Al Khor. The manager of , is Amar Osim.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al Kharaitiyat SC. Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Iraq national under-23 football team. ,'s ground is in Al Khor. The manager of , is Amar Osim.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al Kharaitiyat SC. Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club. ,'s ground is in Al Khor. The manager of , is Amar Osim.
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Hamilton Academical F.C.. Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Crewe Alexandra F.C.. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-01-01. The 320 , Building 185.42 (centimetres).
Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Scotland national under-21 football team. Alan Martin (footballer) plays for Crewe Alexandra F.C.. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-01-01. The 320 , Building 185.42 (centimetres).
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Dynamo Moscow. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-02-24. The 320 , Building 185.0 (centimetres).
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Rubin Kazan. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-02-24. The 320 , Building 185.0 (centimetres).
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv. Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Zestafoni. , was born in Batumi. The 320 , Building 178.0 (centimetres).
Alex Plante plays for Anyang Halla. , was born on the 15th of March 1989-05-09. Alex Plante was born in Canada. , was born in 1989.
Alex Plante plays for Anyang Halla. Alex Plante was born in Canada. The 320 , Building 1.9304. , was born in 1989.
The leader of Canada is Elizabeth II. The Inuktitut language is spoken in Canada. , was born in Canada. The anthem of , is called O Canada te romane.
The leader of Canada is Elizabeth II. Asian Canadians are an ethnic group in the Canada. , was born in Canada. The anthem of , is called O Canada te romane.
The leader of Canada is Elizabeth II. The Slavey language language is spoken in Canada. , was born in Canada. The anthem of , is called O Canada te romane.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Terek Grozny. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar. ,'s ground is in Grozny. The manager of , is Rashid Rakhimov.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow. FC Torpedo Moscow played in the 2014–15 Russian Premier League season. The manager of , is Valery Petrakov. Aleksandr Tukmanov is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Houston Texans is in the city of Texas, New York. Houston Texans is in the city of Houston, New York. ,  debutTeam  Atlanta Falcons 320 , Building was formerly called the Houston Texans Bank Building.
Abel Hernández plays for Hull City A.F.C.. The manager of Hull City A.F.C. is Steve Bruce. , play in Uruguayan Primera División A. , played youth football for Peñarol.
(19255) 1994 VK8  epoch  2006-12-31 (19255) 1994 VK8  orbitalPeriod  8788850000.0 ,  periapsis  6155910000000.0 ,  apoapsis  6603633000.0 (kilometres)
(66063) 1998 RO1  epoch  2013-11-04 (66063) 1998 RO1  orbitalPeriod  360.29 (days) ,  escapeVelocity  0.0999 (kilometre Per Seconds) ,  apoapsis  254989570.60815 (kilometres)
(66063) 1998 RO1  meanTemperature  265.0 (kelvins) (66063) 1998 RO1  apoapsis  254989570.60815 (kilometres) ,  epoch  2013-11-04 ,  orbitalPeriod  360.29 (days)
1000 Piazzia  epoch  2015-06-27 1000 Piazzia  orbitalPeriod  488160.0 ,  periapsis  352497000000.0 ,  escapeVelocity  0.0252 (kilometre Per Seconds)
320 1001 Gaussia Building was formerly called the 1923 OAA907 XC Bank Building. 1001 Gaussia  discoverer  Sergey Belyavsky ,  epoch  2015-06-27 ,  periapsis  419113394.55312 (kilometres)
Walter Baade was born in German Empire. University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Allan Sandage
Walter Baade was born in Preußisch Oldendorf. University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Halton Arp
University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. Walter Baade Powys died in West Germany. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Halton Arp
University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater. James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  deathCause  Peritonitis
James Craig Watson is an Canada. James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  apoapsis  437170000.0 (kilometres)
James Craig Watson is an Canada. James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  deathCause  Peritonitis
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham. N. R. Pogson Powys died in Chennai. ,  discoverer  N. R. Pogson ,  periapsis  479343000.0 (kilometres)
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham. N. R. Pogson Powys died in Chennai. ,  discoverer  N. R. Pogson ,  discovered  2001-03-01
320 1089 Tama Building was formerly called the A894 VA; A904 VD; Bank Building. 1089 Tama  epoch  2005-11-26 ,  orbitalPeriod  1202.846 (days) ,  periapsis  288749000000.0
1089 Tama  escapeVelocity  0.0068 (kilometre Per Seconds) 1089 Tama  orbitalPeriod  1202.846 (days) ,  epoch  2005-11-26 ,  apoapsis  373513000.0 (kilometres)
1097 Vicia  epoch  2006-12-31 1097 Vicia class is 9.8 (kilograms). ,  orbitalPeriod  135589000.0 ,  apoapsis  511592000.0 (kilometres)
109 Felicitas  epoch  2006-12-31 109 Felicitas  orbitalPeriod  139705000.0 ,  periapsis  283326000000.0 ,  escapeVelocity  0.0473 (kilometre Per Seconds)
320 10 Hygiea Building was formerly called the A900 GA Bank Building. 10 Hygiea  epoch  2015-06-27 ,  orbitalPeriod  5.57 (days) ,  periapsis  416136000000.0
1101 Clematis  epoch  2006-12-31 1101 Clematis  escapeVelocity  0.02 (kilometre Per Seconds) ,  orbitalPeriod  183309000.0 ,  apoapsis  520906000.0 (kilometres)
320 1101 Clematis Building was formerly called the 1928 SJ Bank Building. 1101 Clematis  epoch  2006-12-31 ,  orbitalPeriod  183309000.0 ,  periapsis  445895000000.0
1101 Clematis  escapeVelocity  0.02 (kilometre Per Seconds) 1101 Clematis  orbitalPeriod  183309000.0 ,  periapsis  445895000000.0 ,  epoch  2006-12-31
1955 Dodge is located in the region V8 engine. 1955 Dodge  manufacturer  Dodge ,  transmission  3-speed automatic , 120.0 (inches) a website.
1955 Dodge  relatedMeanOfTransportation  De Soto Custom De Soto Custom  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Chrysler Newport ,  successor  De Soto Firedome ,  manufacturer  De Soto (automobile)
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises. The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building.
AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. AIDAstella was operated by AIDA Cruises. The runway length of , Airport is 253260.0 (millimetres). The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building.
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at ALCO RS-3 Row. , is located in the region V12 engine. , is governed by the Diesel-electric transmission and County Council.
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. The runway length of ALCO RS-3 Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres). , is located in the region V12 engine. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at , Row.
American Locomotive Company was founded in Schenectady, New York, D.C. The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. The runway length of , Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres). , is located in United States.
The ALCO RS-3 is a Montreal Locomotive Works events venue type building. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at ALCO RS-3 Row. , is located in the region V12 engine. , is governed by the Diesel-electric transmission and County Council.
The ALCO RS-3 is a Montreal Locomotive Works events venue type building. There are 12 floors at ALCO RS-3 Row. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at , Row. , is located in the region Four-stroke engine.
The comic character AMC Matador is also known as American Motors Matador. AMC Matador  assembly  Mexico City ,  bodyStyle  Station wagon , is located in the region AMC V8 engine.
The comic character AMC Matador is also known as VAM Classic. AMC Matador class is Mid-size car. ,  assembly  Kenosha, Wisconsin , is located in the region AMC straight-6 engine.
Acura TLX class is Mid-size car. Acura TLX  assembly  Marysville, Ohio ,  layout  front-wheel drive / all-wheel drive , is located in the region Honda K engine.
Acura TLX class is Luxury vehicle. Acura TLX  assembly  Marysville Auto Plant , is located in the region V6 engine. ,  layout  Front-engine design
Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker) is In service. The Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker) is a Finland events venue type building. ,  shipBeam  21.2 The , is a Arctech Helsinki Shipyard events venue type building.
The leader of Finland is Juha Sipilä. Finland demonym is Finns. The , is a Finland events venue type building. The , is a Helsinki events venue type building.
Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker) is In service. Aleksey Chirikov (icebreaker)  shipBeam  21.2 The , is a Helsinki events venue type building. The , is a Arctech Helsinki Shipyard events venue type building.
Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Saab 9000 , is located in the region Straight-four engine. ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Lancia Thema
Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Saab 9000 , is located in the region V6 engine.
Alhambra is Wrecked. Alhambra  shipBeam  8.3 m The runway length of , Airport is 63800.0 (millimetres). ,  shipLaunch  1855-05-31
Alvis Car and Engineering Company was founded in Coventry, D.C. Alvis Speed 25  manufacturer  Alvis Car and Engineering Company , is located in the region Petrol. ,  successor  Rover Company
Alvis Car and Engineering Company was founded in Coventry, D.C. Alvis Speed 25  manufacturer  Alvis Car and Engineering Company , is located in the region Straight-six engine. ,  successor  Rover Company
Roy D. Chapin, Jr. is the key person for American Motors. American Motors  successor  Eagle (automobile) ,  manufacturer  American Motors , is in Chrysler, Sri Lanka.
American submarine NR-1  shipBeam  3.8 m American submarine NR-1  shipLaunch  1969-01-25 ,  topSpeed  8.334 The , is a General Dynamics Electric Boat events venue type building.
American submarine NR-1  shipLaunch  1969-01-25 American submarine NR-1  topSpeed  8.334 The runway length of , Airport is 45000.0 (millimetres). ,  shipBeam  3.8 m
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Antares (rocket)  finalFlight  2014-10-28 ,  maidenFlight  2013-04-21 Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,.
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Antares (rocket)  maidenFlight  2013-04-21 Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,. ,  finalFlight  2013-09-18
London is the capital of United kingdom. Aston Martin V8  assembly  United Kingdom ,  successor  Aston Martin Virage ,  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8 is located in the region 5.3 (litres). ,  assembly  United Kingdom ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin RHAM/1
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8 is located in the region 5.3 (litres). ,  successor  Aston Martin Virage ,  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Atlas II  diameter  3.04 m Atlas II  finalFlight  2002-12-05 Vandenberg Air Force Base is the architect of ,. Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of ,.
Audi A1 class is Supermini. Audi A1 is located in the region 1.2 (litres). ,  layout  Front-engine, front-wheel-drive layout ,  assembly  Audi Brussels
Audi was founded by August Horch Reith 1st Baron Reith. Audi belongs to the division of Audi e-tron. ,  manufacturer  Audi ,  subsidiary  Ducati
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Illinois. AIDAluna Regional Airport owner AIDA Cruises, Michigan. , was founded in California, D.C. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Costa Crociere is located in Genoa. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises. The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building.
Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of Delta II. Antares (rocket)  comparable  Delta II , is located in United States. Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,.
Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex 2 is the architect of Delta II. Cape Canaveral Air Force Station is the architect of Delta II. ,  comparable  Delta II , is located in United States.
Fiat Croma  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Opel Vectra Alfa Romeo 164  assembly  Italy ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma ,  bodyStyle  Sedan (automobile)
Fiat Croma  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Opel Vectra Alfa Romeo 164  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Fiat Croma ,  assembly  Milan ,  bodyStyle  Sedan (automobile)
General Dynamics Electric Boat University is the parent company of the General Dynamics University Press. General Dynamics Electric Boat is located in Groton, Connecticut. ,  shipBeam  3.8 m The , is a General Dynamics Electric Boat events venue type building.
Rostock is located in Germany. The leader of Germany is Stanislaw Tillich. , is located in Rostock. The , is a Neptun Werft events venue type building.
The English language is spoken in United States. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , is located in United States.
Washington is the capital of United States. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , demonym is Americans. , is located in United States.
Aaron Bertram the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Ska punk. Aaron Bertram  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kids Imagine Nation ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Suburban Legends ,  bandMember  Brian Robertson (trombonist)
Aaron Deer the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Psychedelia. Aaron Deer  background  solo singer , is located in the region Indianapolis. , is located in the region Indiana.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Electroacoustic music. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Isis (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Sumac (band) ,  instrument  Singing
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Post-metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Old Man Gloom ,  activeYearsStartYear  1995
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Sumac (band) ,  instrument  Electric guitar ,  musicFusionGenre  Death metal
Ace Wilder was born on the 15th of March 1982-07-23. Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ace Wilder was born on the 15th of March 1982-07-23. Ace Wilder was born in Sweden. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ace Wilder was a Songwriter. Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ace Wilder was a Songwriter. Ace Wilder was born in Sweden. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ahmet Ertegun the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Ahmet Ertegun is located in the region Washington, D.C.. ,  background  non performing personnel , is located in the region United States.
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Ahmet Ertegun the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock and roll. , is located in the region United States. ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Albennie Jones the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Albennie Jones  activeYearsEndYear  1950 ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues ,  derivative  Disco
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Albennie Jones was born in United States. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Aleksandra Kovač was born in Belgrade. Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. , was born in 1972. ,  background  solo singer
Aleksandra Kovač was born in Socialist Republic of Serbia. Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1972.
Alex Day the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Acoustic music. Alex Day  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Chameleon Circuit (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Charlie Mc Donnell ,  activeYearsStartYear  2006
Alex Day the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Electronic music. Alex Day  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Chameleon Circuit (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Charlie Mc Donnell ,  activeYearsStartYear  2006
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England. Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester. , Powys died in London. , was born in 1872.
Montevideo is located in Uruguay. The leader of Montevideo is Daniel Martínez (politician). , demonym is Uruguayans. , Powys died in Montevideo.
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay. Alfredo Zitarrosa the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Candombe. The area code of ,, Indiana is RCA Records. ,  background  solo singer
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk music. Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bajik ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Flibbertigibbet ,  activeYearsStartYear  1963
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk music. Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mellow Candle ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Head South By Weaving ,  activeYearsStartYear  1963
Deram Records is located in London. Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. The area code of ,, Indiana is Deram Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Floating World Records.
Deram Records is located in London. Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. The area code of ,, Indiana is Deram Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Fruits de Mer Records.
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell. Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Acoustic music. , was born in 1981. ,  background  solo singer
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, KY, raised in Dothan, AL. Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. , was born in 1981. ,  background  solo singer
Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. Alternative rock  musicFusionGenre  Nu metal ,  stylisticOrigin  Punk rock ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Billy Iuso ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Tab Benoit ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Galactic
Alligator Records is located in Chicago. Alligator Records the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Blues. The area code of ,, Indiana is Alligator Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Shanachie Records.
Andra (singer) was a Singing. Andra (singer) was born in Romania. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Dance-pop. ,  background  solo singer
Andra (singer) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Rhythm and blues  derivative  Funk ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues ,  derivative  Disco
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jonathan Mendelsohn ,  activeYearsStartYear  2009
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jwaydan Moyine ,  stylisticOrigin  House music ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns
Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaiser Chiefs ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow ,  activeYearsStartYear  2003
Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaiser Chiefs Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow The area code of ,, Indiana is Universal Records (defunct record label). ,  activeYearsStartYear  2003
Asunción is part of Gran Asunción. The leader of Paraguay is Juan Afara. , Powys died in Asunción. , Powys died in Paraguay.
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Country music. Country music  instrument  Banjo ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  NRBQ ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  The Wildweeds
Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Hip hop music  stylisticOrigin  Disco ,  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  derivative  Drum and bass
Manchester is part of Greater Manchester. The leader of Manchester is Labour Party (UK). , was born in England. , was born in Manchester.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Post-metal. Post-metal  instrument  Cello ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  House of Low Culture
Twilight (band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  instrument  Electric guitar ,  musicFusionGenre  Death metal
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Albennie Jones was born in United States. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the American Civil War Grenada. , Powys died in West Roxbury.
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Battle of the Wilderness Grenada. , Powys died in West Roxbury.
Ab Klink was born in Netherlands. , is affiliated with the Association of MBAs of American Universities. Erasmus University Rotterdam is Ab Klink Johnson's almaMater. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Ministry of Health, Welfare and Sport (Netherlands)
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri, Malaysia. , Kuching resides in the United States. Abdul Taib Mahmud is located in the region Asajaya. The leader party at , is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Kingdom of Sarawak. , Sarawak resides in the United States. Abdul Taib Mahmud is located in the region Asajaya. The leader party at , is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Adenan Satem was born in Japanese occupation of British Borneo. Abdul Taib Mahmud Sarawak resides in the United States. ,  successor  Adenan Satem The leader party at , is the Barisan Ra'ayat Jati Sarawak Party (Spain).
Adenan Satem was born in Japanese occupation of British Borneo. Abdul Taib Mahmud Sarawak resides in the United States. ,  successor  Adenan Satem The leader party at , is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Abdulsalami Abubakar  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Mike Akhigbe Abdulsalami Abubakar  militaryBranch  Nigerian Army ,  predecessor  Oladipo Diya ,  successor  Atiku Abubakar
Abdulsalami Abubakar  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Mike Akhigbe Mike Akhigbe  predecessor  Oladipo Diya ,  successor  Al-Amin Daggash ,  militaryBranch  Nigerian Air Force
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia (Spain). Abel Caballero  inOfficeWhileMonarch  Juan Carlos I of Spain ,  predecessor  Francisco Franco ,  inOfficeWhilePrimeMinister  Felipe González
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia (Spain). Abel Caballero was born in Spain. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Minister of Transport The leader party at , is the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party Party (Spain).
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Abraham A. Ribicoff is an United States. , was born in New Britain, Connecticut. ,  spouse  Casey Ribicoff
Adam Holloway was born in Kent. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Gulf War Grenada. Magdalene College, Cambridge is Adam Holloway Johnson's almaMater. ,  activeYearsStartDate  2005-05-05
The Polish language language is spoken in Poland. Adam Koc is an Poland. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Polish–Soviet War Grenada. , was commanded by Joseph Stalin.
One of the noted Adam Koc Air Force battles was the Polish–Soviet War Grenada. Polish–Soviet War was commanded by Joseph Stalin. , Powys died in New York City. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  Russian Civil War
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Vice-President of New Democracy ,  successor  Makis Voridis
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Ministry of Economy, Development and Tourism (Greece) ,  successor  Makis Voridis
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the Hellenic Parliament ,  successor  Makis Voridis
The leader of Socialist Party (Netherlands) is Emile Roemer. Agnes Kant is an Netherlands. The currency in , is Euro. The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. Agnes Kant is an Netherlands. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  House of Representatives (Netherlands) The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. The leader of Socialist Party (Netherlands) is Emile Roemer. , is an Netherlands. The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
The leader of Socialist Party (Netherlands) is Emile Roemer. Agnes Kant is an Netherlands. , is located in Red. The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London. One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the Battle of France Grenada. ,  activeYearsStartDate  1953-06-30 ,  activeYearsEndDate  1979-03-30
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London. One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the Battle of France Grenada. ,  activeYearsStartDate  1974-03-04 ,  activeYearsEndDate  1979-03-30
One of the noted Airey Neave Air Force battles was the World War II Grenada. World War II was commanded by Chiang Kai-shek. ,  unit  Royal Artillery The chair of the , Party in the United States is Hohne Schultz.
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland. William M. O. Dawson was born in Bloomington, Maryland. , Powys died in Parkersburg, West Virginia. ,  successor  William M. O. Dawson
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland. Albert B. White  successor  William M. O. Dawson ,  activeYearsEndDate  1905-03-04 ,  activeYearsStartDate  1901-03-04
The French language is spoken in New York. Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the American Civil War Grenada. , was commanded by Abraham Lincoln.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City. One of the noted Albert Jennings Fountain Air Force battles was the American Civil War Grenada. , was commanded by Jefferson Davis. , Powys died in Doña Ana County, New Mexico.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York. Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island. , Powys died in New Mexico Territory. , Powys died in United States.
The leader of Buenos Aires is Horacio Rodríguez Larreta. Alberto Teisaire Powys died in Buenos Aires. The leader party at , is the Justicialist Party Party (Spain). ,  inOfficeWhilePresident  Juan Perón
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina. Alberto Teisaire  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Provisional President of the Argentine Senate , is located in the region Rear admiral. ,  successor  Isaac Rojas
Alfred Moore Scales was born in Reidsville, North Carolina. Alfred Moore Scales  successor  Daniel Gould Fowle ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of North Carolina The leader party at , is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut. One of the noted United States Army Air Force battles was the Whiskey Rebellion Grenada. ,  militaryBranch  United States Army ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Connecticut's 4th district
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut. The leader party at Alfred N. Phillips is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Albert E. Austin ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Connecticut's 4th district
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut. The leader party at Alfred N. Phillips is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Albert E. Austin ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Mayor of Stamford, Connecticut
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. The leader party at Allan Shivers is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Price Daniel ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of Texas
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. The leader party at Allan Shivers is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Wilfred R. Cousins, Jr. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of Texas
Burlington, Vermont is the largest city in Vermont, Texas. , is in Vermont, Sri Lanka. Alvah Sabin is located in the region Vermont's 3rd congressional district. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Secretary of State of Vermont
The leader of Whig Party (United States) is Daniel Webster. Burlington, Vermont is the largest city in ,, Texas. Alvah Sabin is located in the region Vermont. The leader party at , is the Whig Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart. One of the noted Aaron S. Daggett Air Force battles was the Battle of Gettysburg Grenada. , was commanded by Robert E. Lee. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
The Spanish language language is spoken in Argentina. Alberto Teisaire is an Argentina. The leader party at , is the Labour Party (Argentina) Party (Spain). ,  inOfficeWhilePresident  Juan Perón
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina. The leader party at Juan Perón is the Labour Party (Argentina) Party (Spain). ,  successor  Isaac Rojas ,  inOfficeWhilePresident  Juan Perón
AIDA Cruises is located in Germany. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises. , University is the parent company of the Carnival Corporation & plc University Press. The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building.
AIDAstella was operated by AIDA Cruises. AIDAstella  shipBeam  32.2 ,  topSpeed  38.892 The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building. The runway length of , Airport is 253260.0 (millimetres).
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. The runway length of ALCO RS-3 Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres). There are 12 floors at , Row. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at , Row. , is located in the region Four-stroke engine.
The ALCO RS-3 is a American Locomotive Company events venue type building. The runway length of ALCO RS-3 Airport is 17068.8 (millimetres). There are 12 floors at , Row. , is located in the region V12 engine. May 1950 - August 1956 was the start date for the building at , Row.
Washington is the capital of United States. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , demonym is Americans. The anthem of , is called The Star-Spangled Banner te romane. , is located in United States.
The comic character AMC Matador is also known as American Motors Matador. AMC Matador class is Mid-size car. ,  assembly  Thames, New Zealand ,  bodyStyle  Station wagon , is located in the region AMC V8 engine.
P&O (company) is located in London. Alhambra Regional Airport owner P&O (company), Michigan. ,  shipBeam  8.3 m , is governed by the Humphrys, Tennant and Dykes and County Council. The , is a Samuda Brothers events venue type building.
Roy D. Chapin, Jr. is the key person for American Motors. American Motors  successor  Eagle (automobile) ,  subsidiary  Wheel Horse ,  manufacturer  American Motors , is in Chrysler, Sri Lanka.
American submarine NR-1  shipLaunch  1969-01-25 American submarine NR-1  topSpeed  8.334 ,  shipDraft  4.6 m The runway length of , Airport is 45000.0 (millimetres). ,  shipBeam  3.8 m
Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport is the architect of Antares (rocket). Antares (rocket)  comparable  Delta II , is located in United States. Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,. ,  associatedRocket  Minotaur IV
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Antares (rocket)  finalFlight  2014-07-13 ,  maidenFlight  2014-10-28 Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,. ,  diameter  3.9 (metres)
Antares (rocket)  manufacturer  Yuzhnoye Design Office Antares (rocket)  maidenFlight  2014-10-28 Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 is the architect of ,. ,  diameter  3.9 (metres) ,  finalFlight  2013-09-18
Ariane 5  finalFlight  2009-12-18 Ariane 5  maidenFlight  2005-08-11 ,  manufacturer  Airbus Defence and Space Guiana Space Centre is the architect of ,. ,  diameter  5.4 (metres)
ELA-3 was operated by Arianespace. The headquarters of Guiana Space Centre Airlines are located in French Guiana. , is located in Courcouronnes. , Guiana Space Centre a website. ELA-3 is the architect of ,.
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin DBS  successor  Aston Martin Vantage ,  assembly  Newport Pagnell , is located in the region 5.3 (litres). ,  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS Aston Martin V8  bodyStyle  Coupé , is located in the region 5.3 (litres). ,  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin RHAM/1 ,  assembly  Newport Pagnell
The leader of United kingdom is Elizabeth II. Aston Martin V8  relatedMeanOfTransportation  Aston Martin DBS ,  assembly  United Kingdom ,  successor  Aston Martin Virage ,  manufacturer  Aston Martin
Audi A1 class is Supermini. Audi A1 is located in the region 1.2 (litres). ,  layout  Front-engine, front-wheel-drive layout ,  assembly  Brussels, Belgium ,  bodyStyle  Hatchback
Audi was founded by August Horch Reith 1st Baron Reith. Audi belongs to the division of Audi e-tron. ,  manufacturer  Audi ,  subsidiary  Ducati ,  subsidiary  Lamborghini
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois. AIDAluna Regional Airport owner AIDA Cruises, Michigan. , was founded in California, D.C. , was founded in United States, D.C. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock. AIDAluna Regional Airport owner AIDA Cruises, Michigan. Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person for ,. , was founded in United States, D.C. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois. AIDAluna Regional Airport owner AIDA Cruises, Michigan. Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person for ,. , was founded in United States, D.C. , is governed by the Caterpillar Inc. and County Council.
Costa Crociere is located in Genoa. AIDAstella Regional Airport owner Costa Crociere, Michigan. , was operated by AIDA Cruises. , University is the parent company of the Carnival Corporation & plc University Press. The , is a Meyer Werft events venue type building.
The leader of Finland is Juha Sipilä. The Sami languages language is spoken in Finland. , demonym is Finns. The , is a Finland events venue type building. The , is a Arctech Helsinki Shipyard events venue type building.
Rostock is located in Germany. The leader of Germany is Joachim Gauck. Berlin is the capital of ,. , is located in Rostock. The , is a Neptun Werft events venue type building.
Rostock is located in Germany. The leader of Germany is Andreas Voßkuhle. Berlin is the capital of ,. , is located in Rostock. The , is a Neptun Werft events venue type building.
The English language is spoken in United States. Washington, D.C. is the capital of ,. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. , demonym is Americans. , is located in United States.
Abel Hernández plays for Central Español. Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. The manager of , is Jorge Orosmán da Silva. , play in Uruguayan Segunda División A. , played youth football for Peñarol.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow. , plays for Soviet Union national football team. The leader of Russia is Valentina Matviyenko. The manager of , is Valery Petrakov. , Powys died in Russia.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv. Aleksandre Guruli plays for Olympique Lyonnais. ,'s ground is in Parc Olympique Lyonnais. The manager of , is Oleh Luzhny. Jean-Michel Aulas is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.C. Milan. Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria. The manager of , is Siniša Mihajlović. , play in Serie A A. , is located in Defender (football).
Alessio Romagnoli plays for Italy national under-17 football team. Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria. The manager of , is Siniša Mihajlović. Silvio Berlusconi is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis. The currency in , is A.C. Milan.
Abel Hernández plays for Uruguay national football team. Abel Hernández plays for U.S. Città di Palermo. The manager of , is Giuseppe Iachini. , play in Uruguayan Segunda División A. , played youth football for Central Español.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Amkar Perm. ,'s ground is in Otkrytiye Arena. The manager of , is Gadzhi Gadzhiyev. Sergey Rodionov is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Terek Grozny. ,'s ground is in Grozny. The manager of , is Rashid Rakhimov. Sergey Rodionov is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Terek Grozny. Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Dynamo Moscow. ,'s ground is in Grozny. The manager of , is Rashid Rakhimov. , played youth football for FC Spartak Moscow.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow. Aleksandr Chumakov plays for Soviet Union national football team. , played in the 2014–15 Russian Premier League season. The manager of , is Valery Petrakov. , was born in Soviet Union.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvárosi TC. Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C.. ,'s ground is in Palo Seco. The manager of , is Thomas Doll. Gábor Kubatov is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvárosi TC. Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C.. ,'s ground is in Palo Seco Velodrome. The manager of , is Thomas Doll. Gábor Kubatov is chairman of , Efxeinoupolis.
(19255) 1994 VK8  epoch  2006-12-31 (19255) 1994 VK8 class is 5.6 (kilograms). ,  orbitalPeriod  8788850000.0 ,  periapsis  6155910000000.0 ,  apoapsis  6603633000.0 (kilometres)
James Craig Watson is an Canada. University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  discovered  1868-08-15
University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater. James Craig Watson Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  stateOfOrigin  Canada ,  deathCause  Peritonitis
Walter Baade was born in German Empire. University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in Göttingen. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Allan Sandage
Walter Baade was born in German Empire. University of Göttingen is Walter Baade Johnson's almaMater. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Halton Arp ,  doctoralStudent  Allan Sandage
Walter Baade is an Germany. Walter Baade was born in German Empire. University of Göttingen is , Johnson's almaMater. ,  discoverer  Walter Baade ,  doctoralStudent  Allan Sandage
James Craig Watson is an Canada. University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  discovered  1868-09-07
James Craig Watson is an Canada. University of Michigan is James Craig Watson Johnson's almaMater. , Powys died in Madison, Wisconsin. ,  discoverer  James Craig Watson ,  periapsis  371240000.0 (kilometres)
107 Camilla  discoverer  B. Zellner 107 Camilla  orbitalPeriod  2368.05 (days) ,  periapsis  479343000.0 (kilometres) ,  epoch  2006-12-31 ,  apoapsis  560937000.0 (kilometres)
107 Camilla  discoverer  C. Woods 107 Camilla  orbitalPeriod  2368.05 (days) ,  periapsis  479343000.0 (kilometres) ,  epoch  2006-12-31 ,  apoapsis  560937000.0 (kilometres)
107 Camilla  discoverer  F. Vilas 107 Camilla  epoch  2006-12-31 ,  orbitalPeriod  2368.05 (days) ,  periapsis  479343000.0 (kilometres) ,  apoapsis  560937000.0 (kilometres)
N. R. Pogson is an England. N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham. , Powys died in Chennai. ,  discoverer  N. R. Pogson ,  absoluteMagnitude  7.08
320 1089 Tama Building was formerly called the A919 HA; 1927 WB; Bank Building. 1089 Tama  epoch  2005-11-26 ,  escapeVelocity  0.0068 (kilometre Per Seconds) ,  orbitalPeriod  1202.846 (days) ,  apoapsis  373513000.0 (kilometres)
1101 Clematis  epoch  2006-12-31 1101 Clematis  escapeVelocity  0.02 (kilometre Per Seconds) , class is 5.7 (kilograms). ,  orbitalPeriod  183309000.0 ,  apoapsis  520906000.0 (kilometres)
11264 Claudiomaccone  epoch  2005-11-26 11264 Claudiomaccone  orbitalPeriod  1513.722 (days) ,  periapsis  296521000.0 (kilometres) ,  apoapsis  475426000.0 (kilometres) ,  temperature  173.0 (kelvins)
, was born on the 15th of March 1936-05-21. Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri, Malaysia. , Kuching resides in the United States. Abdul Taib Mahmud is located in the region Asajaya. The leader party at , is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Kingdom of Sarawak. University of Adelaide is Adenan Satem Johnson's almaMater. , Demak Jaya, Jalan Bako, Kuching, Sarawak resides in the United States. ,  successor  Adenan Satem The leader party at , is the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu Party (Spain).
Abdulsalami Abubakar  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Mike Akhigbe Abdulsalami Abubakar  activeYearsEndDate  1999-05-29 ,  predecessor  Oladipo Diya ,  militaryBranch  Nigerian Navy ,  successor  Atiku Abubakar
Abdulsalami Abubakar  successor  Olusegun Obasanjo Abdulsalami Abubakar  inOfficeWhileVicePresident  Mike Akhigbe ,  activeYearsEndDate  1999-05-29 ,  militaryBranch  Nigerian Army ,  predecessor  Oladipo Diya
Abraham A. Ribicoff is an United States. Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut. , Powys died in United States. The leader party at , is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of Connecticut
Abraham A. Ribicoff is an United States. Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut. , Powys died in New York City. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  United States Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare The leader party at , is the Democratic Party (United States) Party (Spain).
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. Abraham A. Ribicoff is an United States. , was born in Connecticut. , Powys died in New York. ,  spouse  Casey Ribicoff
Adam Holloway was born in Kent. Magdalene College, Cambridge is Adam Holloway Johnson's almaMater. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Member of Parliament for Gravesham ,  activeYearsStartDate  2005-05-05 ,  militaryBranch  Grenadier Guards
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham, Kent, England. Magdalene College, Cambridge is Adam Holloway Johnson's almaMater. The leader party at , is the Conservative Party (UK) Party (Spain). ,  activeYearsStartDate  2005-05-05 ,  militaryBranch  Grenadier Guards
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece. Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens. ,  inOfficeWhilePrimeMinister  Antonis Samaras ,  inOfficeWhilePrimeMinister  Konstantinos Mitsotakis ,  successor  Makis Voridis
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. The leader of Socialist Party (Netherlands) is Emile Roemer. , is an Netherlands. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  House of Representatives (Netherlands) The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. The leader of House of Representatives (Netherlands) is Khadija Arib. , is an Netherlands. , Doesburg resides in the United States. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  House of Representatives (Netherlands)
The leader of Netherlands is Mark Rutte. The leader of Socialist Party (Netherlands) is Emile Roemer. , is an Netherlands. , Doesburg resides in the United States. The leader party at , is the Socialist Party (Netherlands) Party (Spain).
Albert B. White was born on the 15th of March 1856-09-22. Albert B. White Powys died in Parkersburg, West Virginia. , was born in 1856. ,  deathYear  1941 The architect , died in 1941-07-03, Texas.
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland. William M. O. Dawson was born in Bloomington, Maryland. , Powys died in Parkersburg, West Virginia. ,  spouse  Agnes Ward White ,  successor  William M. O. Dawson
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland. Albert B. White  spouse  Agnes Ward White ,  successor  William M. O. Dawson ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Governor of West Virginia ,  activeYearsEndDate  1905-03-04
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland. Albert B. White  successor  William M. O. Dawson The leader party at , is the Republican Party (United States) Party (Spain). ,  activeYearsEndDate  1905-03-04 ,  activeYearsStartDate  1901-03-04
The leader of Buenos Aires is Horacio Rodríguez Larreta. Alberto Teisaire Powys died in Buenos Aires. ,  spouse  Eva Perón The leader party at , is the Labour Party (Argentina) Party (Spain). ,  inOfficeWhilePresident  Juan Perón
Alberto Teisaire was born on the 15th of March 1891-05-20. Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina. ,  office (workedAt, workedAs)  Provisional President of the Argentine Senate , is located in the region Rear admiral. ,  successor  Isaac Rojas
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol (state). Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria. , Powys died in Styria. , Powys died in Graz. The leader party at , is the Austrian People's Party Party (Spain).
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol (state). Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst. , Powys died in Styria. , Powys died in Graz. The leader party at , is the Austrian People's Party Party (Spain).
Burlington, Vermont is the largest city in Vermont, Texas. , is in Vermont, Sri Lanka. , Powys died in Sycamore, Illinois. Alvah Sabin is located in the region Vermont's 3rd congressional district. ,  activeYearsEndDate  1857-03-03
Burlington, Vermont is the largest city in Vermont, Texas. , was born in Georgia, Vermont. , is in Vermont, Sri Lanka. , Powys died in Sycamore, Illinois. Alvah Sabin is located in the region Vermont's 3rd congressional district.
Alfred Moore Scales is located in United States. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Battle of Gettysburg Grenada. , was commanded by Jefferson Davis. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
Alfred Moore Scales is located in United States. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. One of the noted , Air Force battles was the Siege of Petersburg Grenada. , was commanded by Jefferson Davis. ,  isPartOfMilitaryConflict  American Civil War
The Spanish language language is spoken in Argentina. Alberto Teisaire is an Argentina. ,  spouse  Eva Perón The leader party at , is the Labour Party (Argentina) Party (Spain). ,  inOfficeWhilePresident  Juan Perón
Aaron Bertram the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Ska punk. Aaron Bertram  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kids Imagine Nation ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Suburban Legends ,  bandMember  Brian Robertson (trombonist) ,  stylisticOrigin  Punk rock
Aaron Deer the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Indie rock. Aaron Deer is located in the region United States. ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Wee Giant ,  background  solo singer , is located in the region Indiana.
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Old Man Gloom ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Lotus Eaters (band) , is located in the region United States. ,  activeYearsStartYear  1995
Aaron Turner the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Sludge metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Lotus Eaters (band) , is located in the region Massachusetts. ,  activeYearsStartYear  1995
, was born on the 15th of March 1978-11-12. Abradab was born in Katowice. Abradab was born in Poland. ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Magik (rapper) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaliber 44
Ace Wilder was born on the 15th of March 1982-07-23. , was a Singing. Ace Wilder was born in Sweden. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ace Wilder was born on the 15th of March 1982-07-23. , was a Songwriter. Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1982.
Ace Wilder the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Hip hop music  musicSubgenre  Gangsta rap ,  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  derivative  Drum and bass ,  stylisticOrigin  Disco
Ace Wilder was born in Sweden. Ace Wilder the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. ,  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  derivative  Drum and bass ,  stylisticOrigin  Disco
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) was born in Windsor, Connecticut. Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  NRBQ ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  The Wildweeds ,  activeYearsStartYear  1966
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Al Anderson (NRBQ band)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  NRBQ ,  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music) ,  instrument  Guitar ,  stylisticOrigin  Country music
Alan Frew was a Musician. Alan Frew was born in Coatbridge. , is located in the region Canada. , is located in the region Newmarket, Ontario. ,  background  solo singer
Aleksandra Kovač was born in Socialist Republic of Serbia. Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Pop music. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1972. ,  musicFusionGenre  Disco
Aleksandra Kovač the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. Aleksandra Kovač  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  K2 (Kovač sisters duo) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kornelije Kovač ,  background  solo singer ,  activeYearsStartYear  1990
Alfred Garth Jones is an United Kingdom. Alfred Garth Jones was born in England. , was born in Manchester. , Powys died in London. , was born in 1872.
The leader of London is Boris Johnson. The London, Pakistan, is led by European Parliament Assembly of the Punjab. , was born in Manchester. , Powys died in Sidcup. , Powys died in London.
The leader of Manchester is Labour Party (UK). The London, Pakistan, is led by European Parliament Assembly of the Punjab. , was born in Manchester. , Powys died in Sidcup. , Powys died in London.
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Folk music of Ireland. Alison O'Donnell  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Flibbertigibbet ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Mellow Candle The area code of ,, Indiana is Floating World Records. ,  activeYearsStartYear  1963
Deram Records is located in London. Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. ,  derivative  Funk The area code of ,, Indiana is Deram Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Stanyan Records.
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  derivative  Funk ,  musicFusionGenre  Afrobeat ,  instrument  Autoharp ,  stylisticOrigin  Folk music
Alison O'Donnell the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Jazz. Jazz  stylisticOrigin  Blues ,  derivative  Funk ,  musicFusionGenre  Afrobeat ,  instrument  Voice, bodhrán, percussion, autoharp
Allen Forrest was born in Dothan, Alabama. Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Acoustic music. , was born in 1981. ,  background  solo singer
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Billy Iuso ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Voice of the Wetlands All-Stars ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Galactic ,  activeYearsStartYear  1989
Anders Osborne the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Blues. Anders Osborne  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Galactic ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Tab Benoit ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Billy Iuso ,  activeYearsStartYear  1989
Andra (singer) was born in Câmpia Turzii. Andra (singer) was a singer, Reality television judge. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Dance-pop. , was born in 1986. ,  background  solo singer
Andra (singer) was a Singing. Andra (singer) was born in Romania. , the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rhythm and blues. ,  background  solo singer , was born in 1986.
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Armin van Buuren ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bobina ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Armin Van Buuren, Bobina, Mark Sixma, Jonathan Mendelsohn, Christian Burns, Jwaydan, Alexander Popov, Jano, Alexandre Bergheau, Jonny Rose, Sylvia Tosun, Lira Yin, Alexandra Badoi ,  stylisticOrigin  Pop music
Andrew Rayel was born in Chișinău, Moldova. Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Armin van Buuren ,  activeYearsStartYear  2009
Andrew Rayel was born in Chișinău, Moldova. Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jwaydan Moyine ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Bobina ,  activeYearsStartYear  2009
Andrew Rayel the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Trance music. Andrew Rayel  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Jwaydan Moyine ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  John Digweed ,  instrument  String instrument ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Christian Burns
Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Kaiser Chiefs Andrew White (musician)  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Marry Banilow The area code of ,, Indiana is B-Unique Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Polydor Records. ,  activeYearsStartYear  2003
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell. Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. ,  stylisticOrigin  Disco ,  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  derivative  Drum and bass
Allen Forrest the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Hip hop music. Hip hop music  stylisticOrigin  Disco , was born in 1981. ,  stylisticOrigin  Funk ,  derivative  Drum and bass
The leader of Manchester is Labour Party (UK). The London, Pakistan, is led by Parliament Assembly of the Punjab. , was born in Manchester. , Powys died in Sidcup. , Powys died in London.
The leader of Paraguay is Juan Afara. The Spanish language language is spoken in Paraguay. Mestizo are an ethnic group in the ,. , was born in Asunción. , Powys died in Paraguay.
Polydor Records is located in London. Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. ,  musicFusionGenre  Nu metal The area code of ,, Indiana is B-Unique Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Polydor Records.
Polydor Records is located in London. Andrew White (musician) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Alternative rock. ,  musicFusionGenre  Nu metal The area code of ,, Indiana is Polydor Records. The area code of ,, Indiana is Universal Records (defunct record label).
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Rock music  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music) ,  instrument  Guitar ,  stylisticOrigin  Country music ,  stylisticOrigin  Blues
Al Anderson (NRBQ band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Rock music. Rock music  stylisticOrigin  Blues ,  musicFusionGenre  Bhangra (music) ,  instrument  Banjo ,  stylisticOrigin  Country music
Twilight (band) the Evil Librarians is in the genre of Black metal. Aaron Turner  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Twilight (band) ,  associatedBand/associatedMusicalArtist  Old Man Gloom ,  instrument  Electric guitar ,  musicFusionGenre  Death metal
Montevideo is located in Uruguay. The leader of Uruguay is Raúl Fernando Sendic Rodríguez. The leader of , is Daniel Martínez (politician). The Spanish language language is spoken in ,. , Powys died in Montevideo.
